Characteristics of a two-stage screen for incident dementia.To avoid costly evaluation of healthy individuals, efficient methods of screening for incident dementia must combine adequate sensitivity and high specificity. Two-stage screening may offer improvements over single-stage methods. We therefore investigated a two-stage screening protocol for incident dementia among 3,308 elderly.We administered the Modified Mini-Mental-State (3MS) or, rarely, Jorm's IQCODE, to a validation sample of 441 high-risk respondents. Informants then completed the Dementia Questionnaire (DQ). Finally, all 441 sample members underwent physical, neurologic, and neuropsychologic assessment. We studied the sensitivity and specificity of the 3MS/IQCODE and DQ using Receiver-Operating Characteristic analyses.A 3MS cut point of 82/83 (of 100) yielded sensitivity and specificity of 91.5 and 90.1%. With 3MS scores of < or =82, a DQ cut point of 2/3 (of five) yielded conditional sensitivity and specificity of 90.2 and 55.3%. Combining these instruments yielded sensitivity and specificity of 82.5 and 95.6%. Age stratification and use of longitudinal decline score criteria did not materially improve these figures.The improved specificity of the two-stage approach offers economies that are attractive, particularly if sensitivity can be enhanced, for example, by examination of a high-risk validation sample.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) as a screening tool for dementia for a predominantly illiterate Chinese population.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) provides ratings of an individual's changes in everyday cognitive functions during the previous 10 years. Original studies conducted in Australia showed that its score was not influenced by the subjects' educational backgrounds and that it performed at least as well as the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) as a screening instrument for dementia. The subjects of the present study were Chinese and included 399 community residents and 61 dementia patients. Their ages ranged from 50 to 92 years; their education levels ranged from 0 to 19 years, and 63% of them had never attended school. We administered the IQCODE to informants and the Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI), from which a CASI-estimated score of the MMSE (MMSE-CE) can be obtained, to the subjects. The diagnosis of dementia was made independently by physicians according to the DSM-III-R criteria based on semistructured interview and testing, neurologic examination, and standardized assessments of cerebral vascular disease, Parkinson's disease, and depression. The Chinese IQCODE showed no association with the subjects' education level or gender, low association with their age, and moderately high association with their MMSE-CE score. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of the IQCODE was significantly larger than that of the MMSE-CE for the whole group and for the subgroup with 1 to 19 years of education but not for the subgroup with 0 years of education. Nine of the 26 items of the IQCODE could be deleted without appreciable reduction in sensitivity and specificity. The IQCODE (1) can be shortened to 17 items, (2) had good cross-cultural applicability, and (3) was better than the MMSE-CE as a screening tool for dementia in a population with large variation in educational backgrounds.[Awareness in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI)].Patients with Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) run a higher risk for the development of a dementia. A disturbed awareness of deficits is a symptom of dementia and could be a predictor for the development of dementia in the assessment in the early stages of dementia. This awareness can be assessed by means of the discrepancy between the assessment of memory problems by patient and partner. In this study, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE-N) was used to assess the level of awareness. The results show that the discrepancy score (the difference between the IQCODE-Nscore of the patient and the IQCODE-Nscore of the partner) was significantly higher for the 61 MCI-patients when compared to the 40 healthy elderly (p = 0,01). This suggests a diminished awareness in MCI-patients. Analysis of the range of the MCI-group shows that this is true for 60% of the patients. Patients with a disturbed awareness score significantly lower on the MMSE (p < 0,01) than patients with an intact awareness.Performance of Brazilian long and short IQCODE on the screening of dementia in elderly people with low education.Dementia screening in elderly people with low education can be difficult to implement. For these subjects, informant reports using the long (L) (26 items) and short (C) (16 items) versions of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) can be useful. The objective of the present study was to investigate the performance of Brazilian versions of the IQCODE L, S and a new short version (SBr) (15 items) in comparison with the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) for dementia screening in elderly people with low education.Thirty-four patients with mild to moderate dementia, diagnosed according to ICD-10 criteria, and 57 controls were evaluated and divided into three groups based on their socioeconomic status and level of education. Patients were evaluated using the MMSE and the informants were interviewed using the IQCODE by interviewers blind to the clinical diagnosis.Education was correlated with MMSE results (r = 0.280, p = 0.031), but not with the versions of the IQCODE. The performance of the instruments, evaluated by the ROC curves, was very similar, with good internal consistency (Cronbach's alpha = 0.97). MMSE correctly classified 85.7% of the subjects while the three IQCODE versions (L, S and SBr) correctly classified 91.2% of the subjects.The long, short and the new short Brazilian IQCODE versions can be useful as a screening tool for mild and moderate patients with dementia in Brazil. The IQCODE is not biased by schooling, and it seems to be an adequate instrument for samples with low levels of education.A short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE): development and cross-validation.Data from four studies were used to assess the psychometric properties of the 26 IQCODE items. The items were assessed in terms of item-total correlations, test-retest reliabilities, correlations with indicators of current cognitive functioning and correlations with indicators of premorbid cognitive functioning. These data were used to develop a 16-item short form. The short form was cross-validated in a new sample using dementia/delirium diagnosis as the validity standard. It was found to perform as well as the long form.Screening of dementia in community-dwelling elderly through informant report.Screening tools for cognitive decline still have low accuracy for dementia, mainly in cases of mild dementia. All of them are affected by factors such as age, sex, educational level, sensory deficits and several mental disorders. The information provided by a proxy close to the patient has been used during recent years in dementia diagnosis. Therefore, new questionnaires, which use standardized information from relatives, have been developed. The aim of this study was to validate a Spanish version (S-IQCODE) of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), a dementia screening questionnaire in Spanish population-based samples. A validity study of the screening tool was carried out in two population-based samples of community-dwelling elderly with different sociodemographic characteristics (urban and rural samples). Dementia diagnosis was performed by neurologists according to DSM-III-R criteria. The S-IQCODE showed a higher accuracy than the MMSE in both samples: sensitivity of 82% and 83% vs 73% and 83%, specificity of 90% and 83% vs 78% and 74%, accuracy of 89% and 83% vs 77% and 75%. Moreover, while the S-IQCODE did not have associations with any extraneous factors, the MMSE showed significant correlations with age (-0.51), educational level (0.62), mental health (-0.40), premorbid intelligence (0.67) and intellectual level (0.75). The results obtained with the S-IQCODE show that it could possibly be applied in screening for dementia in community-dwelling elderly.Sensitivity of the informant questionnaire on cognitive decline: an application of item response theory.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline (IQCODE) is a formal informant report instrument, originally developed by Jorm and Jacomb (1989; Psychological Medicine, 19(4), 1015). The goal of the present study was to evaluate the range of cognitive decline in which the IQCODE is most sensitive, using item response theory (IRT). Existing data (N = 740) from a sample of community-dwelling older adults was used for this purpose. A 2-parameter model estimating item difficulty and discrimination fit the data best. Additionally, the IQCODE provided the most psychometric information in the range of -0.5 < theta < 1.5, with peak information obtained at approximately theta = 0.4. Based on individuals' latent score (theta) estimates, items on the IQCODE are adequate for use as a screening tool for dementia. Results of the item calibration may be useful for targeted assessment needs, such as the development of short forms.Validation of a French version of an informant-based questionnaire as a screening test for Alzheimer's disease.Development of informant-based screening tests for dementia is an emerging field. The reliability and validity of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), an instrument that screens for dementia in general, have been established. We conducted a study to validate a French version of the IQCODE as a screening test for Alzheimer's dementia in the elderly living in the community.In the Canadian Study of Health and Aging, subjects were screened in their own homes using the modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3-MS). Those who screened positive, along with a sample of subjects who screened negative, were referred for a complete clinical examination. In Quebec, an informant was asked to complete the French version, IQCODE(F), at that time. Based on the final clinical diagnoses, performances of the IQCODE(F) and Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE, converted from 3-MS) in screening for Alzheimer's disease were evaluated.Of the 237 subjects, the mean IQCODE (F) score was 3.4 (s.d. = 0.6), on a 5-point scale (1 = improvement in condition over the past 10 years, 5 = marked deterioration, 3 = no change). The mean MMSE score was 23.1 (s.d. = 4.5). The scores on the two scales were correlated (r = -0.44, P < 0.001). The IQCODE(F) scores were unrelated to education (r = -0.07, P > 0.3) in contrast to the MMSE scores (r = 0.28, P < 0.001). With respect to a diagnosis of probable Alzheimer's disease, the IQCODE(F) (cut-off point 3.6) had a sensitivity of 75% and a specificity of 95.6%. The sensitivity and specificity of the MMSE (cut-off point 23) were 70% and 82.3% respectively.The findings of the IQCODE(F) are consistent with those of the English version in correlation with the MMSE and apparent freedom from educational bias. The IQCODE is superior to the MMSE as a screening test for probable Alzheimer's disease in the elderly living in the community. It may be a useful addition to the screening tests already available, especially for the less well educated.The Informant Questionnaire on cognitive decline in the elderly (IQCODE): a review.The IQCODE is widely used as a screening test for dementia, particularly where the subject is unable to undergo direct cognitive testing or for screening in populations with low levels of education and literacy. This review draws together research on the psychometric properties and validity of the IQCODE.A systematic search of the literature was carried out using three databases.The review shows that the questionnaire has high reliability and measures a single general factor of cognitive decline. It validly reflects past cognitive decline, performs at least as well at screening as conventional cognitive screening tests, predicts incident dementia, and correlates with a wide range of cognitive tests. A particular strength is that the IQCODE is relatively unaffected by education and pre-morbid ability or by proficiency in the culture's dominant language. The disadvantage of the IQCODE is that it is affected by informant characteristics such as depression and anxiety in the informant and the quality of the relationship between the informant and the subject.Because the IQCODE provides information complementary to brief cognitive tests, harnessing them together can improve screening accuracy.Can an informant questionnaire be used to predict the development of dementia in medical inpatients?To determine whether elderly medical inpatients without dementia who score >3.31 on the short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) are at an increased risk of developing dementia.Twenty-nine patients with an IQCODE score of >3.31 without dementia and 29 age- and sex-matched controls, from an original sample of 201 medical inpatients over 65, were examined 17-24 months after initial assessment.Interviews took place in patients' homes, but all subjects had been recruited while medical inpatients in a general hospital 17-24 months previously.The IQCODE and clinical interview to make DSM-III-R diagnosis of dementia.Ten of the study group and one control had developed dementia since the original assessment.Non-demented elderly medical inpatients with an admission IQCODE score of >3.31 are more likely to develop dementia than those with an IQCODE score of <3.31. The IQCODE is a sensitive tool for detecting early dementia.Informant ratings of cognitive decline of elderly people: relationship to longitudinal change on cognitive tests.Formal assessment of cognitive decline with cognitive tests can be difficult, requiring either two measurement points or a comparison of 'hold' with 'don't hold' tests. Informant-based assessment provides an alternative approach because informants can adopt a longitudinal perspective and directly rate cognitive change. A study was carried out to assess the validity of informant ratings collected by means of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE). A community sample of 500 subjects aged 74 or over underwent four cognitive tests on two occasions 3 1/2 years apart. On the second occasion, informants filled out the IQCODE. Subjects rated as having moderate or severe decline were found to have greater change on the cognitive tests. These findings support the validity of informant ratings of cognitive decline.Screening for dementia: a review of self- and informant-assessment instruments.The objective of this study was to review available dementia screening instruments that could be recommended for self-administration, particularly in electronic format. Owing to the gradual loss of insight associated with the progression of dementia, a broad definition of self-administration including self-administration by concerned informants (family, friends, carers) was used.A systematic search of PubMed, PsychINFO, and the Cochrane Library Database was conducted. Only available full-text articles about dementia screening instruments written in English were included. Articles reporting on instruments used in a non-English context were excluded unless a validated English version of the instrument was available. Included instruments were assessed against the precise criteria and characteristics of the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE), the most widely used screening instrument.The Concord Informant Dementia Scale (CIDS) and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) were the only instruments meeting all selection criteria. The Memory Impairment Screen (MIS) also met the criteria, although it lacks validation for self-administration. No instrument has been validated for self-administration in electronic format.It is recommended that the MIS, the CIDS and the IQCODE be validated for self-administration in electronic format.Can IQCODE differentiate Alzheimer's disease and frontotemporal dementia?Discriminant validity and reliability of the Turkish version of Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE-T).The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) has been used as a measure of cognitive decline in different cultures. The purpose of the study was to establish the validity and reliability of the Turkish version of IQCODE (IQCODE-T) and the ability of the questionnaire to distinguish between older adults with DSM-IV-TR dementia (n = 100) and healthy control participants (n = 60). In addition, the power of the IQCODE-T to distinguish between patients with depression and dementia was investigated. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) was performed on all participants and the IQCODE-T was administered to their informants. The IQCODE-T, which was not associated with age or education of the patients, significantly differentiated patients with dementia and controls. The IQCODE-T also correctly classified 73% of depressed patients as "non-demented". Because it is easy to administer, not associated with age/education and yields fewer false-positive results than the MMSE in depression, the IQCODE-T can be used in the detection of dementia.Performance characteristics of a two-stage dementia screen in a population sample.We analyzed the performance of a two-stage screening protocol [the Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS) or the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline (IQCODE), and the Dementia Questionnaire (DQ)] in a weighted stratified sample of 839 subjects from a population survey of dementia in Cache County, UT. The subjects were subsequently examined using a standardized diagnostic assessment protocol. Using the method of receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, the main outcome measure was area under the ROC curve (AUC). The overall AUC estimates were 0.956 (95% confidence interval 0.943-0.968) for the 3MS/IQCODE and 0.945 (0.931-0.960) for the DQ. After adjustment for age, the efficiency of the both 3MS/IQCODE and the DQ was better for subjects with genotype epsilon4/epsilon4 at APOE, better among women, and better in those with two or more years duration of dementia. The optimal threshold for this two-stage screen yielded sensitivity and specificity estimates of 91.0% and 92.0%, respectively.[Cognitive dysfunction among the elderly evaluated by the cognitive abilities screening instrument (CASI)].The Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI) was developed by Japanese and American researchers, including the authors, to examine cognitive functions, based on previous neuropsychological tests, such as Hasegawa's Dementia Scale and the MMSE. From the Adult Health Study (AHS) population of the Radiation Effects Research Foundation, 2052 men and women aged 60 or over and living in Hiroshima were evaluated for their cognitive functions using the CASI. Dementia was diagnosed in 93 and 1,959 were considered not to suffer from dementia based on the DSM-III-R criteria using neurological examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) completed by caregivers. Multivariate regression analysis not only indicated that total score was higher with lower age and higher education but that the slope of its decrease is steeper with higher age and fewer years of education. The slope of score decrease with increase of age was steeper for women than for men. Furthermore, CASI items were categorized by domains of cognitive function. Multivariate regression analysis for each cognitive domain showed clear effects of age and level of education. The effect of age for the nondementia subjects was large in cognitive domains dealing with temporal orientation, short-term memory, and list-generating fluency. The most useful cognitive domains for diagnosing dementia were temporal orientation, short-term memory, and list-generating fluency, as was indicated by high sensitivity and specificity.Delirium is an important predictor of incident dementia among elderly hip fracture patients.Delirium is believed to constitute a risk factor for dementia, but previous research has failed to satisfactorily take account of the patients' preexisting level of cognitive functioning.A prospective 6-month follow-up of 106 elderly hip fracture patients free from prefracture dementia. Delirium was assessed by the Confusion Assessment Method. Caregivers described the patients' prefracture cognition by the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly, Short Form (IQCODE-SF). Cognition was measured after 6 months, using 5 validated cognitive tests. An expert panel assessed each case as to whether the diagnostic criteria for dementia according to the DSM-IV were fulfilled at baseline and after 6 months.29/106 patients (27%) developed delirium in the acute phase. In the delirious group, 11/29 (38%) fulfilled the criteria of dementia after 6 months, compared to 5/77 (7%) in the group without delirium (p < 0.001; χ(2) test). Delirium was the strongest predictor of dementia after 6 months (adjusted odds ratio: 10.5; 95% CI: 1.6-70.3). IQCODE-SF score was a nonsignificant risk factor for incident dementia.In hip fracture patients free from prefracture dementia, delirium constitutes the main predictor of dementia 6 months later, adjusted for prefracture cognitive decline measured by the IQCODE-SF.Differentiating between demented and psychiatric patients with the Dutch version of the IQCODE.This study presents psychometric data on the Dutch version of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE-N). We focused on differentiating between inpatients with dementia or a mood/psychotic disorder. A cutoff point of 3.9 on the IQCODE-N correctly predicted group membership in 87.8% and 78.8% respectively. Internal consistency and principal component analysis suggest that the IQCODE-N measures a unidimensional construct. Correlations with a Dementia Screening Test (r = 0.62), nurses' observations on memory disorders (r = 0.71) and a global assessment of severity of dementia (r = 0.72) support the validity of the informant ratings. Patients' age and level of education did not confound informant ratings. Only a small fraction of the informants could not complete the IQCODE-N, which makes it an easily applicable rating scale for cognitive decline.Discriminative and predictive power of an informant report in mild cognitive impairment.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) requires caregivers to rate decline in patients' cognitive and functional performance and has never been used for mild cognitive impairment (MCI).We contrasted the discriminative and predictive power of the IQCODE with that of the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and a verbal episodic memory measure, the Rey's Auditory Verbal Learning Test (RAVLT), in 45 patients with MCI (mean (SD) age at baseline: 71.6 (4.7) years) and 30 outpatients with dementia (70.5 (6.3) years) attending the Neuropsychology Service, St Gerardo Hospital, and compared them with 55 cognitively intact elderly people (70.7 (7.1) years). Patients with MCI were followed up for at least 2 years or until conversion to dementia.In total, 24 patients with MCI (53.3%) had converted to dementia at follow up (mean (SD) duration of follow up 17.0 (7.3) months for converters and 35.0 (7.1) months for non-converters). At baseline, the ability to differentiate patients with MCI from healthy controls was similar for the IQCODE (area under the curve (AUC) 0.86) and the MMSE (AUC 0.84; z = 0.53, not significant). As predictors of conversion to dementia, a trend favouring the IQCODE (AUC 0.86) with respect to immediate (AUC 0.74) and delayed (AUC 0.75) recall on the RAVLT was apparent (z = 1.36, p = 0.087 versus immediate recall, z = 1.51, p = 0.064 versus delayed recall). The independent predictive ability of IQCODE and memory scores was evaluated through logistic regression, and the questionnaire alone yielded the best correct classification of 81%.The IQCODE is an informant based measure of cognitive decline that may provide a relevant contribution to the diagnostic and prognostic investigation of patients with MCI.Combining functional scales and cognitive tests in screening for mild cognitive impairment at a university-based memory clinic in Brazil.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of the Mini-Mental State Examination combined to the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly for the identification of mild cognitive impairment.191 elderly subjects were assessed with the Mini-Mental State Examination, and their informants were assessed with the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly. Subjects were divided into three groups according to their cognitive state (controls: n = 67, mild cognitive impairment: n = 65 and dementia: n = 59), which was ascertained by clinical and neuropsychological evaluation. The diagnostic accuracy of each test in the discrimination of diagnostic groups (mild cognitive impairment vs. controls, mild cognitive impairment vs. dementia and dementia vs. controls) was examined with the aid of ROC curves. We additionally verified if the combination of both tests would increase diagnostic accuracy for mild cognitive impairment and control identification.The combination of the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly scores did not increase the Mini-Mental State Examination diagnostic accuracy in the identification of patients with mild cognitive impairment.The present data do not warrant the combination of the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly as a sufficient diagnostic tool in the diagnostic screening for mild cognitive impairment.Racial differences in the recognition of cognitive dysfunction in older persons.We assessed the influence of race and education on informants' reports of cognitive decline in 252 community-residing older persons who were receiving services from senior health agencies. An expert consensus panel made diagnoses of normal cognition, cognitive impairment no dementia (CIND), and dementia based on clinical evaluations and standardized neuropsychological testing (using both population and race-adjusted norms). Informants were interviewed using the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE). Informants of black participants with CIND reported less cognitive decline (lower IQCODE scores) than informants of white CIND participants [3.03 (0.61) vs. 3.23 (0.41); t (117)=2.12, P≤0.036] even though there were no significant differences in the participants' functional and neuropsychological impairments. An analysis of covariance which controlled for informant education indicated that this difference in IQCODE scores was attributable to the fact that black informants had fewer years of education than white informants. There was no statistically significant difference in IQCODE scores for black and white participants with dementia [4.0 (0.7) vs. 4.3 (0.7); t (67)=1.37, P=0.177]. We conclude that racially determined differences in perceptions of early cognitive decline and education may influence informant ratings of older persons. These differences may contribute to disparities in the detection and treatment of cognitive disorders in older black persons.[Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE): cross-cultural adaptation for use in Brazil].This article presents the results of the translation and cross-cultural adaptation of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) and the test-retest reliability of a version to be used in Brazil. An instrument review committee analyzed the conceptual and item equivalence. In order to analyze semantic equivalences, three translations and three back-translations were performed; a summary version was devised and pre-tested, and a test version elaborated. The Cronbach's +/- coefficient and intraclass correlation coefficient (ICC) were used to measure the internal consistency and test-retest reliability, respectively. Of the 169 informants assessed, 97 were retested. A Cronbach's +/- of 0.94 and an ICC of 0.92 were found. The reliability levels lead to the conclusion that the IQCODE-BR version is easy to comprehend. Satisfactory equivalence to the original version was observed.Screening properties of the German IQCODE with a two-year time frame in MCI and early Alzheimer's disease.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) is a widely used screening tool for dementia. We aimed to determine the ability of the German version of the 16-item IQCODE with a two-year time frame to discriminate healthy mature control participants (NC) from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and probable early Alzheimer's disease (AD) patients (all with Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) scores >or= 24/30) and to optimize diagnostic discriminability by shortening the IQCODE.453 NC (49.7% women, age = 69.5 years +/- 8.2, education = 12.2 +/- 2.9), 172 MCI patients (41.9% women, age = 71.5 years +/- 8.8, education = 12.3 +/- 3.1) and 208 AD patients (59.1% women, age = 76.0 years +/- 6.4, education = 11.4 +/- 2.9) participated. Stepwise binary logistic regression analyses (LR) were used to shorten the test. Receiver operating characteristic curves (ROC) determined sensitivities, specificities, and correct classification rates (CCRs) for (a) NC vs. all patients; (b) NC vs. MCI; and (c) NC vs. AD patients.The mean IQCODE was 3.00 for NC, 3.35 for MCI, and 3.73 for AD. CCRs were 85.5% (NC-patient group), 79.9% (NC-MCI), and 90.7% (NC-AD), respectively. The diagnostic discriminability of the shortened 7-item IQCODE (i.e. items 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, 10, 14) was comparable with the longer version (i.e. 7-item CCRs: NC-patient group: 85.3%; NC-MCI: 80.1%, NC-AD: 90.5%).The German 16-item IQCODE with two-year time frame showed excellent screening properties for MCI and early AD patients. An abbreviated 7-item version demonstrated equally high diagnostic discriminability, thus allowing for more economical screening.The IQCODE: an alternative screening test for dementia for low educated Thai elderly.To explore an alternative method of screening for dementia in Thai elderly people who have a low educational level. The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the elderly (IQCODE) is used as the screening test.A community based population of elderly subjects in Bangkok including 87 normal subjects and 73 demented elderly people were studied. Their ages ranged from 52 to 85 years old. The majority of the elderly people had had four years or less of primary-education. Dementia was diagnosed independently by DSM IV criteria. A short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), a short form, was administered to informants of the elderly by trained medical personnel. The Thai Mini Mental State Examination (TMSE) was also administered to these subjects and compared with the IQCODE. SPSS 9.0 was used for statistical analysis.The IQCODE showed a negative correlation with the TMSE (n=160, r=-0.679, p<0.001). The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC) of the IQCODE was larger than that of TMSE (0.928 vs 0.814). On logistic regression analysis, there were only three questions that contributed to the diagnosis that showed statistical significance. These questions are remembering what day and month it is, learning how to use a new gadget and handling other everyday arithmetic problems. Applying the new formula (z-score), these three questions showed a sensitivity of 84.90 per cent, and a specificity of 92 per cent for the diagnosis of dementia.Informants' perceptions of cognitive impairment of the elderly can be reliably applied as a screening instrument for dementia in the Thai population with a variety of educational levels. A short form of the IQCODE using selected questions can be administered with good diagnostic sensitivity and specificity.Poststroke dementia: incidence and relationship to prestroke cognitive decline.To evaluate the 3-year incidence of poststroke dementia (PSD) and the influence of prestroke cognitive decline.The authors evaluated prestroke cognitive functions in 202 consecutive stroke patients > or =40 years old using the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), with a cut-off of 104 for the diagnosis of dementia. Six months and then annually after stroke, dementia was reassessed. The diagnosis of dementia was based on the International Classification of Diseases, 10th revision criteria in survivors who underwent a visit with a neurologist, or on the IQCODE score obtained by telephone contact with the family in survivors who did not. Statistics were performed using life-table methods.Thirty-three patients were excluded because of prestroke dementia. In the 169 remaining patients, the cumulative proportion of patients with dementia was 28.5% at the end of the follow-up period, with most of PSD occurring during the first 6 months. Using multivariate analysis, independent predictors of PSD were aging, preexisting cognitive decline, severity of deficit at admission, diabetes mellitus, and silent infarcts. Leukoaraiosis was an independent predictor of PSD when prestroke cognitive decline was not taken into account. The presumed etiology of dementia was vascular dementia (VaD) in two-thirds of patients and AD in one-third.The risk of PSD is high, and increased in patients with prestroke cognitive decline, with about one-third of patients meeting the criteria for AD and two-thirds meeting the criteria for VaD. These results confirm that, in stroke patients, an underlying degenerative pathology may play a role in the development of PSD.The validity of brief screening cognitive instruments in the diagnosis of cognitive impairment and dementia after first-ever stroke.Brief cognitive tests such as the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) have been used to detect cognitive impairment and dementia in studies of stroke patients. However, there are few data on their validity for such use. We have evaluated their validity in detecting cognitive impairment not dementia (CIND) and dementia in a community-based sample of first-ever stroke patients.The standardized MMSE (S-MMSE) and the 16-item IQCODE were administered to 79 patients 1 year after a first-ever stroke. CIND and dementia were diagnosed independently using a comprehensive cognitive battery. The performances of the two tests were evaluated using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analyses. Combined performance was evaluated when their scores were used in parallel (the "or rule"), in series (the "and rule") or as a weighted sum (the "weighted sum rule").Both tests were extremely poor at detecting CIND individually and in combination. For dementia, at traditional cut-points, the S-MMSE (< or =23) was insensitive (0.50, 95% CI 0.16-0.84) and the IQCODE (> or =3.30) nonspecific (0.63, 95% CI 0.51-0.75). An acceptable balance between sensitivity and specificity was achieved for dementia using the "or rule" combination, but with only modest positive predictive value.The S-MMSE and the IQCODE were individually poor at detecting CIND and dementia after a nonaphasic first-ever stroke. The combination was useful in detecting dementia but it does not replace the need for detailed neuropsychological tests.Screening cognitive decline in dementia: preliminary data on the Italian version of the IQCODE.The IQCODE is a retrospective questionnaire for caregivers about changes which occurred in a patient's cognitive and functional efficiency in the previous 10 years of life. Previous studies demonstrated the validity of the IQCODE for the screening of dementia similar to that of traditional cognitive screening tests, with the additional advantage of allowing the detection of cognitive change, rather than just cognitive impairment. The present paper deals with the preliminary results of the validation of the Italian version of the questionnaire in a sample of 45 mild to severely demented patients and 13 patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI), compared to 20 cognitively intact elderly subjects. The IQCODE demonstrated satisfactory discriminative power for dementia as well as for MCI and a good correlation with the MMSE.Everyday functioning in relation to cognitive functioning and neuroimaging in community-dwelling Hispanic and non-Hispanic older adults.The purpose of this study was to examine how a specific informant-based measure of everyday functioning, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE; Jorm & Korten, 1988) relates to cognition and structural neuroimaging in a large multicultural, multilingual sample of Caucasians and Hispanics. Cognitive variables included selected subtests from the Spanish and English Neuropsychological Assessment Scales (SENAS; Mungas et al., 2000): Verbal Memory, Object Naming, Verbal Attention Span, Verbal Conceptual Thinking, and Pattern Recognition. The association between the IQCODE and selected neuroimaging variables, hippocampal volume and white matter hyperintensity, was evaluated in a subsample of English- and Spanish-speaking Hispanic individuals. The cognitive variables showed strong bivariate relationships with the IQCODE, although only Verbal Memory and Object Naming independently predicted level of functional ability. Verbal Memory was the strongest predictor of functional status, accounting for 23% of the variance in the IQCODE. White matter hyperintensity was also independently related to the IQCODE, accounting for 18% of the variance. Hippocampal volume was related to the IQCODE in a simple bivariate analysis, but was not an independent predictor of reported functional status after controlling for age. The relationships between cognitive variables and functional status, as well as between the imaging variables and the IQCODE, did not differ across language-ethnic groups.Improving screening accuracy for dementia in a community sample by augmenting cognitive testing with informant report.This study sought to determine whether the augmentation of cognitive testing with an informant report questionnaire could improve accuracy in screening for dementia in a community setting. The sample consisted of 646 subjects aged 70-93 years. Cognitive state was assessed using the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). Informants completed the 16-item short form of the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE). Dementia was diagnosed according to DSM-III-R criteria. Combination of the IQCODE with the MMSE resulted in more accurate prediction of caseness than either test alone. Receiver Operating Characteristic analysis demonstrated the superior screening performance of a logical "or" rule and a weighted sum of scores on the two tests over other methods of combination, replicating previous clinically based research. The findings also suggest that the appropriate combination of existing tests may be a fruitful method of improving screening accuracy in a variety of situations.Utility of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) for dementia in a Japanese-American population.Ethnic diversity among older patients in Hawai'i is common; yet few data exist concerning the applicability of cognitive testing instruments in non-Caucasian populations. This project aimed to determine the specificity and sensitivity of the IQCODE for the detection of cognitive impairment in a Japanese-American population. Results confirm that the IQCODE is a valuable tool for primary care physicians to detect impairment in this population.[Validation of the S-IQCODE: the Spanish version of the informant questionnaire on cognitive decline in the elderly].Although in the last decade the screening test of dementia have improved, is still being of interest the study of simple methods with a most sensitivity and specificity in the detection of the cognitive decline. Jorm et al have used recently a questionnaire (IQCODE) by which a subject's relative informs of the decline suffered by this in his cognitive capacity. In this work is showed a spanish adaptation of this test, the spanish-IQCODE, analysing it's usefulness for the detection of mild dementia. The S-IQCODE shows a diagnostic validity (sensitivity of 86%, specificity of 92%, positive predictive value of 54% and negative predictive value of 98%) greater than Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE); it also shows a correlation with the diagnostic of dementia greater (r = 0.70 vs r = 0.37); and, different from MMSE, it doesn't show significative correlations with the age, the schooling and the premorbid intelligence. The results in this study show the S-IQCODE as a good test for the detection of the mild dementia, of greater diagnostic power than the MMSE and less contaminated than this by strange variables to the cognitive decline.Informant ratings of cognitive decline in old age: validation against change on cognitive tests over 7 to 8 years.Informant questionnaires on cognitive decline are increasingly used as screening tests for dementia. Informants can provide a longitudinal perspective that is not possible with cognitive screening tests administered at one point in time. However, there are limited data on the validity of such questionnaires when judged against longitudinal change on cognitive tests.A community sample of elderly people aged > or = 70 was assessed on cognitive tests at baseline and after a follow-up of 7-8 years. The participants were given the Mini-Mental State Examination and tests of episodic memory and mental speed. At follow-up, the short-form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) was completed by informants for 287 of the participants.Elderly people who were rated by informants as having moderate or severe decline had declined significantly on cognitive tests. The IQCODE correlated as highly with cognitive test change scores as these change scores correlated with each other.The IQCODE is a valid way of assessing cognitive decline when assessment can be carried out only at one point in time.The screening of mild dementia with a shortened Spanish version of the "Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly".Most of the present screening tests for the detection of dementia fail with mild dementia. Jorm et al. recently presented the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), a simple instrument with good diagnostic validity that uses a close relative to obtain information on the cognitive decline of a patient. We used a Spanish adaptation of this questionnaire (S-IQCODE) validated in a population-based sample, and a shortened form (SS-IQCODE) obtained after analyzing the items and reducing them to only 17. The S-IQCODE and the SS-IQCODE have greater diagnostic validity for mild dementia than the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) (sensitivity: 86% for both versus 57%; specificity: 92 and 91% versus 84%, positive predictive value: 54 and 50% versus 29%; negative predictive value: 91 and 90% versus 81%) and, unlike the MMSE, are independent of the age, education, and previous intelligence of the subjects. According to the results of this study, the SS-IQCODE could be a useful screening test for the detection of mild dementia in the Spanish-speaking aged population, with greater diagnostic power and less contamination by independent variables than the MMSE.[Combined instruments on the evaluation of dementia in the elderly: preliminary results].To determine if a functional scale combined with a cognitive test would improve the diagnostic accuracy of dementia.Thirty patients with mild to moderate dementia, diagnosed according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R criteria, and 46 elderly controls, divided into three groups according to their socioeconomic status and educational level (high, medium and low) were investigated. The subjects were assessed with the MMSE, and their informants were assessed with the scales IQCODE and B-ADL.On the logistic regression, the MMSE isolated classified correctly 86.8% of patients and controls (80% sensitivity and 91.3% specificity). The combination MMSE + IQCODE classified correctly 92.1% of the subjects (83.3% sensitivity and 97.8% specificity), and the combination MMSE + B-ADL classified correctly 92.1% of subjects (86.7% sensitivity and 95.7% specificity).The results suggest that the combination of a cognitive test with a functional scale can improve the detection of mild to moderate cases of dementia even on samples of a very heterogeneous population regarding its socioeconomic status and educational level, as the Brazilian.A comparative study of the performance of screening tests for senile dementia using receiver operating characteristics analysis.The discriminability of three types of test for the detection of senile dementia was assessed within a French sample of 155 normal elderly and 120 persons with mild or moderate senile dementia using Receiver Operating Characteristics (ROC) analysis. Results suggest that despite differences in the content of the three instruments, they are equally discriminant. Methods involving direct cognitive examination were found to lose discriminability in relation to milder forms of dementia, whereas an informant questionnaire was found to perform equally as well on cases of mild and moderate dementia. The informant questionnaire was also found to produce lower refusal rates and to be less influenced by the place of residence of the elderly person. The problem of selecting cut-off points according to the range of predicted prevalence rates of dementia for the general population is also discussed.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE): socio-demographic correlates, reliability, validity and some norms.The IQCODE is a questionnaire which asks an informant about changes in an elderly person's everyday cognitive function. The questionnaire aims to assess cognitive decline independent of pre-morbid ability. In the present study, the IQCODE was administered to a sample of 613 informants from the general population. In addition, the questionnaire was administered to informants of 309 dementing subjects who had filled it out one year previously. A principal components analysis, using the general population sample, confirmed that the IQCODE measures a general factor of cognitive decline. The questionnaire was found to have high internal reliability in the general population sample (alpha = 0.95) and reasonably high test-retest reliability over one year in the dementing sample (r = 0.75). The total IQCODE score, as well as each of the 26-items, was found to discriminate well between the general population and dementing samples. The correlation with education was quite small (r = -0.13), indicating that contamination by premorbid ability is not a problem.Characteristics of a two-stage screen for incident dementia.To avoid costly evaluation of healthy individuals, efficient methods of screening for incident dementia must combine adequate sensitivity and high specificity. Two-stage screening may offer improvements over single-stage methods. We therefore investigated a two-stage screening protocol for incident dementia among 3,308 elderly.We administered the Modified Mini-Mental-State (3MS) or, rarely, Jorm's IQCODE, to a validation sample of 441 high-risk respondents. Informants then completed the Dementia Questionnaire (DQ). Finally, all 441 sample members underwent physical, neurologic, and neuropsychologic assessment. We studied the sensitivity and specificity of the 3MS/IQCODE and DQ using Receiver-Operating Characteristic analyses.A 3MS cut point of 82/83 (of 100) yielded sensitivity and specificity of 91.5 and 90.1%. With 3MS scores of < or =82, a DQ cut point of 2/3 (of five) yielded conditional sensitivity and specificity of 90.2 and 55.3%. Combining these instruments yielded sensitivity and specificity of 82.5 and 95.6%. Age stratification and use of longitudinal decline score criteria did not materially improve these figures.The improved specificity of the two-stage approach offers economies that are attractive, particularly if sensitivity can be enhanced, for example, by examination of a high-risk validation sample.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) as a screening tool for dementia for a predominantly illiterate Chinese population.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) provides ratings of an individual's changes in everyday cognitive functions during the previous 10 years. Original studies conducted in Australia showed that its score was not influenced by the subjects' educational backgrounds and that it performed at least as well as the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) as a screening instrument for dementia. The subjects of the present study were Chinese and included 399 community residents and 61 dementia patients. Their ages ranged from 50 to 92 years; their education levels ranged from 0 to 19 years, and 63% of them had never attended school. We administered the IQCODE to informants and the Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI), from which a CASI-estimated score of the MMSE (MMSE-CE) can be obtained, to the subjects. The diagnosis of dementia was made independently by physicians according to the DSM-III-R criteria based on semistructured interview and testing, neurologic examination, and standardized assessments of cerebral vascular disease, Parkinson's disease, and depression. The Chinese IQCODE showed no association with the subjects' education level or gender, low association with their age, and moderately high association with their MMSE-CE score. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of the IQCODE was significantly larger than that of the MMSE-CE for the whole group and for the subgroup with 1 to 19 years of education but not for the subgroup with 0 years of education. Nine of the 26 items of the IQCODE could be deleted without appreciable reduction in sensitivity and specificity. The IQCODE (1) can be shortened to 17 items, (2) had good cross-cultural applicability, and (3) was better than the MMSE-CE as a screening tool for dementia in a population with large variation in educational backgrounds.[Awareness in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI)].Patients with Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) run a higher risk for the development of a dementia. A disturbed awareness of deficits is a symptom of dementia and could be a predictor for the development of dementia in the assessment in the early stages of dementia. This awareness can be assessed by means of the discrepancy between the assessment of memory problems by patient and partner. In this study, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE-N) was used to assess the level of awareness. The results show that the discrepancy score (the difference between the IQCODE-Nscore of the patient and the IQCODE-Nscore of the partner) was significantly higher for the 61 MCI-patients when compared to the 40 healthy elderly (p = 0,01). This suggests a diminished awareness in MCI-patients. Analysis of the range of the MCI-group shows that this is true for 60% of the patients. Patients with a disturbed awareness score significantly lower on the MMSE (p < 0,01) than patients with an intact awareness.Performance of Brazilian long and short IQCODE on the screening of dementia in elderly people with low education.Dementia screening in elderly people with low education can be difficult to implement. For these subjects, informant reports using the long (L) (26 items) and short (C) (16 items) versions of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) can be useful. The objective of the present study was to investigate the performance of Brazilian versions of the IQCODE L, S and a new short version (SBr) (15 items) in comparison with the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) for dementia screening in elderly people with low education.Thirty-four patients with mild to moderate dementia, diagnosed according to ICD-10 criteria, and 57 controls were evaluated and divided into three groups based on their socioeconomic status and level of education. Patients were evaluated using the MMSE and the informants were interviewed using the IQCODE by interviewers blind to the clinical diagnosis.Education was correlated with MMSE results (r = 0.280, p = 0.031), but not with the versions of the IQCODE. The performance of the instruments, evaluated by the ROC curves, was very similar, with good internal consistency (Cronbach's alpha = 0.97). MMSE correctly classified 85.7% of the subjects while the three IQCODE versions (L, S and SBr) correctly classified 91.2% of the subjects.The long, short and the new short Brazilian IQCODE versions can be useful as a screening tool for mild and moderate patients with dementia in Brazil. The IQCODE is not biased by schooling, and it seems to be an adequate instrument for samples with low levels of education.A short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE): development and cross-validation.Data from four studies were used to assess the psychometric properties of the 26 IQCODE items. The items were assessed in terms of item-total correlations, test-retest reliabilities, correlations with indicators of current cognitive functioning and correlations with indicators of premorbid cognitive functioning. These data were used to develop a 16-item short form. The short form was cross-validated in a new sample using dementia/delirium diagnosis as the validity standard. It was found to perform as well as the long form.Screening of dementia in community-dwelling elderly through informant report.Screening tools for cognitive decline still have low accuracy for dementia, mainly in cases of mild dementia. All of them are affected by factors such as age, sex, educational level, sensory deficits and several mental disorders. The information provided by a proxy close to the patient has been used during recent years in dementia diagnosis. Therefore, new questionnaires, which use standardized information from relatives, have been developed. The aim of this study was to validate a Spanish version (S-IQCODE) of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), a dementia screening questionnaire in Spanish population-based samples. A validity study of the screening tool was carried out in two population-based samples of community-dwelling elderly with different sociodemographic characteristics (urban and rural samples). Dementia diagnosis was performed by neurologists according to DSM-III-R criteria. The S-IQCODE showed a higher accuracy than the MMSE in both samples: sensitivity of 82% and 83% vs 73% and 83%, specificity of 90% and 83% vs 78% and 74%, accuracy of 89% and 83% vs 77% and 75%. Moreover, while the S-IQCODE did not have associations with any extraneous factors, the MMSE showed significant correlations with age (-0.51), educational level (0.62), mental health (-0.40), premorbid intelligence (0.67) and intellectual level (0.75). The results obtained with the S-IQCODE show that it could possibly be applied in screening for dementia in community-dwelling elderly.Sensitivity of the informant questionnaire on cognitive decline: an application of item response theory.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline (IQCODE) is a formal informant report instrument, originally developed by Jorm and Jacomb (1989; Psychological Medicine, 19(4), 1015). The goal of the present study was to evaluate the range of cognitive decline in which the IQCODE is most sensitive, using item response theory (IRT). Existing data (N = 740) from a sample of community-dwelling older adults was used for this purpose. A 2-parameter model estimating item difficulty and discrimination fit the data best. Additionally, the IQCODE provided the most psychometric information in the range of -0.5 < theta < 1.5, with peak information obtained at approximately theta = 0.4. Based on individuals' latent score (theta) estimates, items on the IQCODE are adequate for use as a screening tool for dementia. Results of the item calibration may be useful for targeted assessment needs, such as the development of short forms.Informant ratings of cognitive decline of elderly people: relationship to longitudinal change on cognitive tests.Formal assessment of cognitive decline with cognitive tests can be difficult, requiring either two measurement points or a comparison of 'hold' with 'don't hold' tests. Informant-based assessment provides an alternative approach because informants can adopt a longitudinal perspective and directly rate cognitive change. A study was carried out to assess the validity of informant ratings collected by means of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE). A community sample of 500 subjects aged 74 or over underwent four cognitive tests on two occasions 3 1/2 years apart. On the second occasion, informants filled out the IQCODE. Subjects rated as having moderate or severe decline were found to have greater change on the cognitive tests. These findings support the validity of informant ratings of cognitive decline.Diagnostic utility of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) and its combination with the Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination-Revised (ACE-R) in a memory clinic-based population.The study aimed to assess the clinical utility of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) in patients referred to memory clinics, alone and in combination with the Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination-Revised (ACE-R) and the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE).This pragmatic prospective study was based on consecutive referrals attending with an informant (n = 144) to two memory clinics over a 12-month period. Patients were diagnosed using standard clinical diagnostic criteria for dementia (DSM-IV) as gold standard (dementia prevalence = 59%). The IQCODE was administered to informants, and the ACE-R and/or MMSE to most patients.The IQCODE proved acceptable to informants, and was quick and easy to use. Using traditional parameters of diagnostic utility (sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, likelihood ratios), the performance of the IQCODE at optimal test accuracy was highly sensitive (0.86) for the diagnosis of dementia but specificity was poor (0.39) with suboptimal positive predictive value (0.67) and small or unimportant likelihood ratios. Overall diagnostic accuracy based on area under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was 0.71. Combining the IQCODE with either ACE-R or MMSE greatly improved accuracy, specificity and positive predictive value when the tests were used in series, but not when used in parallel.In a memory clinic based population, the IQCODE proved sensitive for the diagnosis of dementia but overall diagnostic accuracy was suboptimal. Combining the IQCODE in series with the ACE-R or MMSE greatly improved diagnostic utility.Performance of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) as a screening test for dementia.A 26-item informant questionnaire (IQCODE) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) were compared as screening tests for dementia in a sample of 69 patients. Dementia diagnoses were made by both a clinician and a research interview using a computer algorithm to meet DSM-III-R and ICD-10 (Draft) criteria. The IQCODE was found to perform at least as well as the MMSE against all diagnoses and significantly better when judged against the algorithmic ICD-10 diagnoses. Also, the IQCODE was found to be uncontaminated by pre-morbid ability as estimated from the National Adult Reading Test and to have very high test-retest reliability after a delay of a day or more.Can IQCODE differentiate Alzheimer's disease and frontotemporal dementia?Validation of a French version of an informant-based questionnaire as a screening test for Alzheimer's disease.Development of informant-based screening tests for dementia is an emerging field. The reliability and validity of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), an instrument that screens for dementia in general, have been established. We conducted a study to validate a French version of the IQCODE as a screening test for Alzheimer's dementia in the elderly living in the community.In the Canadian Study of Health and Aging, subjects were screened in their own homes using the modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3-MS). Those who screened positive, along with a sample of subjects who screened negative, were referred for a complete clinical examination. In Quebec, an informant was asked to complete the French version, IQCODE(F), at that time. Based on the final clinical diagnoses, performances of the IQCODE(F) and Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE, converted from 3-MS) in screening for Alzheimer's disease were evaluated.Of the 237 subjects, the mean IQCODE (F) score was 3.4 (s.d. = 0.6), on a 5-point scale (1 = improvement in condition over the past 10 years, 5 = marked deterioration, 3 = no change). The mean MMSE score was 23.1 (s.d. = 4.5). The scores on the two scales were correlated (r = -0.44, P < 0.001). The IQCODE(F) scores were unrelated to education (r = -0.07, P > 0.3) in contrast to the MMSE scores (r = 0.28, P < 0.001). With respect to a diagnosis of probable Alzheimer's disease, the IQCODE(F) (cut-off point 3.6) had a sensitivity of 75% and a specificity of 95.6%. The sensitivity and specificity of the MMSE (cut-off point 23) were 70% and 82.3% respectively.The findings of the IQCODE(F) are consistent with those of the English version in correlation with the MMSE and apparent freedom from educational bias. The IQCODE is superior to the MMSE as a screening test for probable Alzheimer's disease in the elderly living in the community. It may be a useful addition to the screening tests already available, especially for the less well educated.Improving detection of dementia in Asian patients with low education: combining the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly.Previous work combining the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) has been conducted in western populations. We ascertained, in an Asian population, (1) the best method of combining the tests, (2) the effects of educational level, and (3) the effect of different dementia etiologies.Data from 576 patients were analyzed (407 nondemented controls, 87 Alzheimer's disease and 82 vascular dementia patients). Sensitivity, specificity and AUC values were obtained using three methods, the 'And' rule, the 'Or' rule, and the 'weighted sum' method.The 'weighted sum' rule had statistically superior AUC and specificity results, while the 'Or' rule had the best sensitivity results. The IQCODE outperformed the MMSE in all analyses. Patients with no education benefited more from combined tests. There was no difference between Alzheimer's disease and vascular dementia populations in the predictive value of any of the combined methods.We recommend that the IQCODE be used to supplement the MMSE whenever available and that the 'weighted sum' method be used to combine the MMSE and the IQCODE, particularly in populations with low education. As the study population selected may not be representative of the general population, further studies are required before generalization to nonclinical samples.The Informant Questionnaire on cognitive decline in the elderly (IQCODE): a review.The IQCODE is widely used as a screening test for dementia, particularly where the subject is unable to undergo direct cognitive testing or for screening in populations with low levels of education and literacy. This review draws together research on the psychometric properties and validity of the IQCODE.A systematic search of the literature was carried out using three databases.The review shows that the questionnaire has high reliability and measures a single general factor of cognitive decline. It validly reflects past cognitive decline, performs at least as well at screening as conventional cognitive screening tests, predicts incident dementia, and correlates with a wide range of cognitive tests. A particular strength is that the IQCODE is relatively unaffected by education and pre-morbid ability or by proficiency in the culture's dominant language. The disadvantage of the IQCODE is that it is affected by informant characteristics such as depression and anxiety in the informant and the quality of the relationship between the informant and the subject.Because the IQCODE provides information complementary to brief cognitive tests, harnessing them together can improve screening accuracy.Can an informant questionnaire be used to predict the development of dementia in medical inpatients?To determine whether elderly medical inpatients without dementia who score >3.31 on the short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) are at an increased risk of developing dementia.Twenty-nine patients with an IQCODE score of >3.31 without dementia and 29 age- and sex-matched controls, from an original sample of 201 medical inpatients over 65, were examined 17-24 months after initial assessment.Interviews took place in patients' homes, but all subjects had been recruited while medical inpatients in a general hospital 17-24 months previously.The IQCODE and clinical interview to make DSM-III-R diagnosis of dementia.Ten of the study group and one control had developed dementia since the original assessment.Non-demented elderly medical inpatients with an admission IQCODE score of >3.31 are more likely to develop dementia than those with an IQCODE score of <3.31. The IQCODE is a sensitive tool for detecting early dementia.Improving screening accuracy for dementia in a community sample by augmenting cognitive testing with informant report.This study sought to determine whether the augmentation of cognitive testing with an informant report questionnaire could improve accuracy in screening for dementia in a community setting. The sample consisted of 646 subjects aged 70-93 years. Cognitive state was assessed using the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). Informants completed the 16-item short form of the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE). Dementia was diagnosed according to DSM-III-R criteria. Combination of the IQCODE with the MMSE resulted in more accurate prediction of caseness than either test alone. Receiver Operating Characteristic analysis demonstrated the superior screening performance of a logical "or" rule and a weighted sum of scores on the two tests over other methods of combination, replicating previous clinically based research. The findings also suggest that the appropriate combination of existing tests may be a fruitful method of improving screening accuracy in a variety of situations.Screening for dementia: a review of self- and informant-assessment instruments.The objective of this study was to review available dementia screening instruments that could be recommended for self-administration, particularly in electronic format. Owing to the gradual loss of insight associated with the progression of dementia, a broad definition of self-administration including self-administration by concerned informants (family, friends, carers) was used.A systematic search of PubMed, PsychINFO, and the Cochrane Library Database was conducted. Only available full-text articles about dementia screening instruments written in English were included. Articles reporting on instruments used in a non-English context were excluded unless a validated English version of the instrument was available. Included instruments were assessed against the precise criteria and characteristics of the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE), the most widely used screening instrument.The Concord Informant Dementia Scale (CIDS) and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) were the only instruments meeting all selection criteria. The Memory Impairment Screen (MIS) also met the criteria, although it lacks validation for self-administration. No instrument has been validated for self-administration in electronic format.It is recommended that the MIS, the CIDS and the IQCODE be validated for self-administration in electronic format.Performance characteristics of a two-stage dementia screen in a population sample.We analyzed the performance of a two-stage screening protocol [the Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS) or the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline (IQCODE), and the Dementia Questionnaire (DQ)] in a weighted stratified sample of 839 subjects from a population survey of dementia in Cache County, UT. The subjects were subsequently examined using a standardized diagnostic assessment protocol. Using the method of receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, the main outcome measure was area under the ROC curve (AUC). The overall AUC estimates were 0.956 (95% confidence interval 0.943-0.968) for the 3MS/IQCODE and 0.945 (0.931-0.960) for the DQ. After adjustment for age, the efficiency of the both 3MS/IQCODE and the DQ was better for subjects with genotype epsilon4/epsilon4 at APOE, better among women, and better in those with two or more years duration of dementia. The optimal threshold for this two-stage screen yielded sensitivity and specificity estimates of 91.0% and 92.0%, respectively.Discriminant validity and reliability of the Turkish version of Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE-T).The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) has been used as a measure of cognitive decline in different cultures. The purpose of the study was to establish the validity and reliability of the Turkish version of IQCODE (IQCODE-T) and the ability of the questionnaire to distinguish between older adults with DSM-IV-TR dementia (n = 100) and healthy control participants (n = 60). In addition, the power of the IQCODE-T to distinguish between patients with depression and dementia was investigated. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) was performed on all participants and the IQCODE-T was administered to their informants. The IQCODE-T, which was not associated with age or education of the patients, significantly differentiated patients with dementia and controls. The IQCODE-T also correctly classified 73% of depressed patients as "non-demented". Because it is easy to administer, not associated with age/education and yields fewer false-positive results than the MMSE in depression, the IQCODE-T can be used in the detection of dementia.Cognitive impairment in medical inpatients. I: Screening for dementia--is history better than mental state?evaluation of the short version of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) and the Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) as screening tools for dementia in medical inpatients.201 patients over 65 were assessed. Assessment included administration of the AMT, a delirium screening instrument and a brief psychiatric interview. Relatives were interviewed and the IQCODE administered. Diagnostic and Statistical Manual (DSM) IIIR diagnoses of various causes of cognitive impairment were made. Sensitivity and specificity values of the screening tests for a DSM IIIR diagnosis of dementia were calculated.our study suggests that the IQCODE is more accurate than the AMT as a screening instrument for dementia. Using a cut-off point of > 3.44, sensitivity and specificity of the IQCODE for diagnosing dementia were 100 and 86% respectively. Equivalent values for the AMT (cut-off point < 8) were 96 and 73%. It was possible to use the IQCODE in eight of the 10 patients unable to complete the AMT.using both the IQCODE and a brief cognitive function test when screening for dementia in medical inpatients will maximize the number of patients who can be screened.The validity of brief screening cognitive instruments in the diagnosis of cognitive impairment and dementia after first-ever stroke.Brief cognitive tests such as the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) have been used to detect cognitive impairment and dementia in studies of stroke patients. However, there are few data on their validity for such use. We have evaluated their validity in detecting cognitive impairment not dementia (CIND) and dementia in a community-based sample of first-ever stroke patients.The standardized MMSE (S-MMSE) and the 16-item IQCODE were administered to 79 patients 1 year after a first-ever stroke. CIND and dementia were diagnosed independently using a comprehensive cognitive battery. The performances of the two tests were evaluated using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analyses. Combined performance was evaluated when their scores were used in parallel (the "or rule"), in series (the "and rule") or as a weighted sum (the "weighted sum rule").Both tests were extremely poor at detecting CIND individually and in combination. For dementia, at traditional cut-points, the S-MMSE (< or =23) was insensitive (0.50, 95% CI 0.16-0.84) and the IQCODE (> or =3.30) nonspecific (0.63, 95% CI 0.51-0.75). An acceptable balance between sensitivity and specificity was achieved for dementia using the "or rule" combination, but with only modest positive predictive value.The S-MMSE and the IQCODE were individually poor at detecting CIND and dementia after a nonaphasic first-ever stroke. The combination was useful in detecting dementia but it does not replace the need for detailed neuropsychological tests.[Cognitive dysfunction among the elderly evaluated by the cognitive abilities screening instrument (CASI)].The Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI) was developed by Japanese and American researchers, including the authors, to examine cognitive functions, based on previous neuropsychological tests, such as Hasegawa's Dementia Scale and the MMSE. From the Adult Health Study (AHS) population of the Radiation Effects Research Foundation, 2052 men and women aged 60 or over and living in Hiroshima were evaluated for their cognitive functions using the CASI. Dementia was diagnosed in 93 and 1,959 were considered not to suffer from dementia based on the DSM-III-R criteria using neurological examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) completed by caregivers. Multivariate regression analysis not only indicated that total score was higher with lower age and higher education but that the slope of its decrease is steeper with higher age and fewer years of education. The slope of score decrease with increase of age was steeper for women than for men. Furthermore, CASI items were categorized by domains of cognitive function. Multivariate regression analysis for each cognitive domain showed clear effects of age and level of education. The effect of age for the nondementia subjects was large in cognitive domains dealing with temporal orientation, short-term memory, and list-generating fluency. The most useful cognitive domains for diagnosing dementia were temporal orientation, short-term memory, and list-generating fluency, as was indicated by high sensitivity and specificity.How useful is the IQCODE for discriminating between Alzheimer's disease, mild cognitive impairment and subjective memory complaints?Informant questionnaires may be useful in diagnosing early dementia. Conflicting results were found when these questionnaires were used to differentiate patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) from healthy elderly subjects. We evaluated the ability of the most commonly used informant questionnaire, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), to discriminate between Alzheimer's disease (AD), MCI and subjective memory complaints (SMC).Informants of 180 AD patients, 59 MCI patients and 89 SMC subjects who visited the Alzheimer Center of the VU University Medical Center between 2004 and 2007 completed the short Dutch version of the IQCODE. Logistic regression and receiver operating characteristic curves were used to evaluate the diagnostic ability of the IQCODE.The IQCODE was able to differentiate AD from MCI and SMC, but was not able to differentiate SMC from MCI.The IQCODE may be helpful in diagnosing AD but is of limited use in differentiating MCI from SMC.Delirium is an important predictor of incident dementia among elderly hip fracture patients.Delirium is believed to constitute a risk factor for dementia, but previous research has failed to satisfactorily take account of the patients' preexisting level of cognitive functioning.A prospective 6-month follow-up of 106 elderly hip fracture patients free from prefracture dementia. Delirium was assessed by the Confusion Assessment Method. Caregivers described the patients' prefracture cognition by the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly, Short Form (IQCODE-SF). Cognition was measured after 6 months, using 5 validated cognitive tests. An expert panel assessed each case as to whether the diagnostic criteria for dementia according to the DSM-IV were fulfilled at baseline and after 6 months.29/106 patients (27%) developed delirium in the acute phase. In the delirious group, 11/29 (38%) fulfilled the criteria of dementia after 6 months, compared to 5/77 (7%) in the group without delirium (p < 0.001; χ(2) test). Delirium was the strongest predictor of dementia after 6 months (adjusted odds ratio: 10.5; 95% CI: 1.6-70.3). IQCODE-SF score was a nonsignificant risk factor for incident dementia.In hip fracture patients free from prefracture dementia, delirium constitutes the main predictor of dementia 6 months later, adjusted for prefracture cognitive decline measured by the IQCODE-SF.Differentiating between demented and psychiatric patients with the Dutch version of the IQCODE.This study presents psychometric data on the Dutch version of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE-N). We focused on differentiating between inpatients with dementia or a mood/psychotic disorder. A cutoff point of 3.9 on the IQCODE-N correctly predicted group membership in 87.8% and 78.8% respectively. Internal consistency and principal component analysis suggest that the IQCODE-N measures a unidimensional construct. Correlations with a Dementia Screening Test (r = 0.62), nurses' observations on memory disorders (r = 0.71) and a global assessment of severity of dementia (r = 0.72) support the validity of the informant ratings. Patients' age and level of education did not confound informant ratings. Only a small fraction of the informants could not complete the IQCODE-N, which makes it an easily applicable rating scale for cognitive decline.Discriminative and predictive power of an informant report in mild cognitive impairment.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) requires caregivers to rate decline in patients' cognitive and functional performance and has never been used for mild cognitive impairment (MCI).We contrasted the discriminative and predictive power of the IQCODE with that of the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and a verbal episodic memory measure, the Rey's Auditory Verbal Learning Test (RAVLT), in 45 patients with MCI (mean (SD) age at baseline: 71.6 (4.7) years) and 30 outpatients with dementia (70.5 (6.3) years) attending the Neuropsychology Service, St Gerardo Hospital, and compared them with 55 cognitively intact elderly people (70.7 (7.1) years). Patients with MCI were followed up for at least 2 years or until conversion to dementia.In total, 24 patients with MCI (53.3%) had converted to dementia at follow up (mean (SD) duration of follow up 17.0 (7.3) months for converters and 35.0 (7.1) months for non-converters). At baseline, the ability to differentiate patients with MCI from healthy controls was similar for the IQCODE (area under the curve (AUC) 0.86) and the MMSE (AUC 0.84; z = 0.53, not significant). As predictors of conversion to dementia, a trend favouring the IQCODE (AUC 0.86) with respect to immediate (AUC 0.74) and delayed (AUC 0.75) recall on the RAVLT was apparent (z = 1.36, p = 0.087 versus immediate recall, z = 1.51, p = 0.064 versus delayed recall). The independent predictive ability of IQCODE and memory scores was evaluated through logistic regression, and the questionnaire alone yielded the best correct classification of 81%.The IQCODE is an informant based measure of cognitive decline that may provide a relevant contribution to the diagnostic and prognostic investigation of patients with MCI.Racial differences in the recognition of cognitive dysfunction in older persons.We assessed the influence of race and education on informants' reports of cognitive decline in 252 community-residing older persons who were receiving services from senior health agencies. An expert consensus panel made diagnoses of normal cognition, cognitive impairment no dementia (CIND), and dementia based on clinical evaluations and standardized neuropsychological testing (using both population and race-adjusted norms). Informants were interviewed using the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE). Informants of black participants with CIND reported less cognitive decline (lower IQCODE scores) than informants of white CIND participants [3.03 (0.61) vs. 3.23 (0.41); t (117)=2.12, P≤0.036] even though there were no significant differences in the participants' functional and neuropsychological impairments. An analysis of covariance which controlled for informant education indicated that this difference in IQCODE scores was attributable to the fact that black informants had fewer years of education than white informants. There was no statistically significant difference in IQCODE scores for black and white participants with dementia [4.0 (0.7) vs. 4.3 (0.7); t (67)=1.37, P=0.177]. We conclude that racially determined differences in perceptions of early cognitive decline and education may influence informant ratings of older persons. These differences may contribute to disparities in the detection and treatment of cognitive disorders in older black persons.Combining cognitive testing and informant report to increase accuracy in screening for dementia.Cognitive testing and an informant report questionnaire were combined to determine whether their use in combination could improve accuracy in screening for the diagnosis of dementia over either test used alone. Methods of combining test scores that can be readily applied in clinical settings were developed and assessed.The subjects were 106 patients admitted to the geriatric hospital or outpatients assessed at the memory clinic of the university hospital system in Geneva, Switzerland. The instruments used were the Mini-Mental State and the short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly. The diagnosis of dementia was made according to DSM-IV criteria.Logistic regression demonstrated that the combination of the Mini-Mental State and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly resulted in more accurate prediction of caseness than either test alone. The performance of logical "or" and "and" combinations of test results and a weighted sum of scores on the two tests as screens for dementia were investigated by using receiver operating characteristic analysis. By using suitable cutoff points, both the "or" rule and the weighted sum were shown to be capable of improving performance over that of either test used alone.This study shows that informant report can be formally incorporated into assessment for dementia in such a way as to increase the accuracy of detection of cases and noncases. A graphical method was developed that enables the most robust approach to be applied to individual cases without any calculation.Screening properties of the German IQCODE with a two-year time frame in MCI and early Alzheimer's disease.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) is a widely used screening tool for dementia. We aimed to determine the ability of the German version of the 16-item IQCODE with a two-year time frame to discriminate healthy mature control participants (NC) from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and probable early Alzheimer's disease (AD) patients (all with Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) scores >or= 24/30) and to optimize diagnostic discriminability by shortening the IQCODE.453 NC (49.7% women, age = 69.5 years +/- 8.2, education = 12.2 +/- 2.9), 172 MCI patients (41.9% women, age = 71.5 years +/- 8.8, education = 12.3 +/- 3.1) and 208 AD patients (59.1% women, age = 76.0 years +/- 6.4, education = 11.4 +/- 2.9) participated. Stepwise binary logistic regression analyses (LR) were used to shorten the test. Receiver operating characteristic curves (ROC) determined sensitivities, specificities, and correct classification rates (CCRs) for (a) NC vs. all patients; (b) NC vs. MCI; and (c) NC vs. AD patients.The mean IQCODE was 3.00 for NC, 3.35 for MCI, and 3.73 for AD. CCRs were 85.5% (NC-patient group), 79.9% (NC-MCI), and 90.7% (NC-AD), respectively. The diagnostic discriminability of the shortened 7-item IQCODE (i.e. items 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, 10, 14) was comparable with the longer version (i.e. 7-item CCRs: NC-patient group: 85.3%; NC-MCI: 80.1%, NC-AD: 90.5%).The German 16-item IQCODE with two-year time frame showed excellent screening properties for MCI and early AD patients. An abbreviated 7-item version demonstrated equally high diagnostic discriminability, thus allowing for more economical screening.Informant ratings of cognitive decline in old age: validation against change on cognitive tests over 7 to 8 years.Informant questionnaires on cognitive decline are increasingly used as screening tests for dementia. Informants can provide a longitudinal perspective that is not possible with cognitive screening tests administered at one point in time. However, there are limited data on the validity of such questionnaires when judged against longitudinal change on cognitive tests.A community sample of elderly people aged > or = 70 was assessed on cognitive tests at baseline and after a follow-up of 7-8 years. The participants were given the Mini-Mental State Examination and tests of episodic memory and mental speed. At follow-up, the short-form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) was completed by informants for 287 of the participants.Elderly people who were rated by informants as having moderate or severe decline had declined significantly on cognitive tests. The IQCODE correlated as highly with cognitive test change scores as these change scores correlated with each other.The IQCODE is a valid way of assessing cognitive decline when assessment can be carried out only at one point in time.The IQCODE: an alternative screening test for dementia for low educated Thai elderly.To explore an alternative method of screening for dementia in Thai elderly people who have a low educational level. The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the elderly (IQCODE) is used as the screening test.A community based population of elderly subjects in Bangkok including 87 normal subjects and 73 demented elderly people were studied. Their ages ranged from 52 to 85 years old. The majority of the elderly people had had four years or less of primary-education. Dementia was diagnosed independently by DSM IV criteria. A short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), a short form, was administered to informants of the elderly by trained medical personnel. The Thai Mini Mental State Examination (TMSE) was also administered to these subjects and compared with the IQCODE. SPSS 9.0 was used for statistical analysis.The IQCODE showed a negative correlation with the TMSE (n=160, r=-0.679, p<0.001). The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC) of the IQCODE was larger than that of TMSE (0.928 vs 0.814). On logistic regression analysis, there were only three questions that contributed to the diagnosis that showed statistical significance. These questions are remembering what day and month it is, learning how to use a new gadget and handling other everyday arithmetic problems. Applying the new formula (z-score), these three questions showed a sensitivity of 84.90 per cent, and a specificity of 92 per cent for the diagnosis of dementia.Informants' perceptions of cognitive impairment of the elderly can be reliably applied as a screening instrument for dementia in the Thai population with a variety of educational levels. A short form of the IQCODE using selected questions can be administered with good diagnostic sensitivity and specificity.Poststroke dementia: incidence and relationship to prestroke cognitive decline.To evaluate the 3-year incidence of poststroke dementia (PSD) and the influence of prestroke cognitive decline.The authors evaluated prestroke cognitive functions in 202 consecutive stroke patients > or =40 years old using the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), with a cut-off of 104 for the diagnosis of dementia. Six months and then annually after stroke, dementia was reassessed. The diagnosis of dementia was based on the International Classification of Diseases, 10th revision criteria in survivors who underwent a visit with a neurologist, or on the IQCODE score obtained by telephone contact with the family in survivors who did not. Statistics were performed using life-table methods.Thirty-three patients were excluded because of prestroke dementia. In the 169 remaining patients, the cumulative proportion of patients with dementia was 28.5% at the end of the follow-up period, with most of PSD occurring during the first 6 months. Using multivariate analysis, independent predictors of PSD were aging, preexisting cognitive decline, severity of deficit at admission, diabetes mellitus, and silent infarcts. Leukoaraiosis was an independent predictor of PSD when prestroke cognitive decline was not taken into account. The presumed etiology of dementia was vascular dementia (VaD) in two-thirds of patients and AD in one-third.The risk of PSD is high, and increased in patients with prestroke cognitive decline, with about one-third of patients meeting the criteria for AD and two-thirds meeting the criteria for VaD. These results confirm that, in stroke patients, an underlying degenerative pathology may play a role in the development of PSD.Combining functional scales and cognitive tests in screening for mild cognitive impairment at a university-based memory clinic in Brazil.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of the Mini-Mental State Examination combined to the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly for the identification of mild cognitive impairment.191 elderly subjects were assessed with the Mini-Mental State Examination, and their informants were assessed with the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly. Subjects were divided into three groups according to their cognitive state (controls: n = 67, mild cognitive impairment: n = 65 and dementia: n = 59), which was ascertained by clinical and neuropsychological evaluation. The diagnostic accuracy of each test in the discrimination of diagnostic groups (mild cognitive impairment vs. controls, mild cognitive impairment vs. dementia and dementia vs. controls) was examined with the aid of ROC curves. We additionally verified if the combination of both tests would increase diagnostic accuracy for mild cognitive impairment and control identification.The combination of the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly scores did not increase the Mini-Mental State Examination diagnostic accuracy in the identification of patients with mild cognitive impairment.The present data do not warrant the combination of the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly as a sufficient diagnostic tool in the diagnostic screening for mild cognitive impairment.Screening cognitive decline in dementia: preliminary data on the Italian version of the IQCODE.The IQCODE is a retrospective questionnaire for caregivers about changes which occurred in a patient's cognitive and functional efficiency in the previous 10 years of life. Previous studies demonstrated the validity of the IQCODE for the screening of dementia similar to that of traditional cognitive screening tests, with the additional advantage of allowing the detection of cognitive change, rather than just cognitive impairment. The present paper deals with the preliminary results of the validation of the Italian version of the questionnaire in a sample of 45 mild to severely demented patients and 13 patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI), compared to 20 cognitively intact elderly subjects. The IQCODE demonstrated satisfactory discriminative power for dementia as well as for MCI and a good correlation with the MMSE.Everyday functioning in relation to cognitive functioning and neuroimaging in community-dwelling Hispanic and non-Hispanic older adults.The purpose of this study was to examine how a specific informant-based measure of everyday functioning, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE; Jorm & Korten, 1988) relates to cognition and structural neuroimaging in a large multicultural, multilingual sample of Caucasians and Hispanics. Cognitive variables included selected subtests from the Spanish and English Neuropsychological Assessment Scales (SENAS; Mungas et al., 2000): Verbal Memory, Object Naming, Verbal Attention Span, Verbal Conceptual Thinking, and Pattern Recognition. The association between the IQCODE and selected neuroimaging variables, hippocampal volume and white matter hyperintensity, was evaluated in a subsample of English- and Spanish-speaking Hispanic individuals. The cognitive variables showed strong bivariate relationships with the IQCODE, although only Verbal Memory and Object Naming independently predicted level of functional ability. Verbal Memory was the strongest predictor of functional status, accounting for 23% of the variance in the IQCODE. White matter hyperintensity was also independently related to the IQCODE, accounting for 18% of the variance. Hippocampal volume was related to the IQCODE in a simple bivariate analysis, but was not an independent predictor of reported functional status after controlling for age. The relationships between cognitive variables and functional status, as well as between the imaging variables and the IQCODE, did not differ across language-ethnic groups.[Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE): cross-cultural adaptation for use in Brazil].This article presents the results of the translation and cross-cultural adaptation of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) and the test-retest reliability of a version to be used in Brazil. An instrument review committee analyzed the conceptual and item equivalence. In order to analyze semantic equivalences, three translations and three back-translations were performed; a summary version was devised and pre-tested, and a test version elaborated. The Cronbach's +/- coefficient and intraclass correlation coefficient (ICC) were used to measure the internal consistency and test-retest reliability, respectively. Of the 169 informants assessed, 97 were retested. A Cronbach's +/- of 0.94 and an ICC of 0.92 were found. The reliability levels lead to the conclusion that the IQCODE-BR version is easy to comprehend. Satisfactory equivalence to the original version was observed.The predictive value of dementia screening instruments in clinical populations.To determine the positive predictive value of the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE), the Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) and the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) for dementia in different clinical settings.Sensitivity and specificity of tests were compared against the criterion standard of clinical diagnosis made by a geriatrician or psychogeriatrician.Two groups of patients were studied, a referred group of outpatients to a memory clinic (MC) and a random selection of patients referred to an aged care assessment team (ACAT).Of 437 eligible MC patients, 299 were used in analyses of whom 216 subjects had dementia. Of 100 randomly selected ACAT patients, 78 agreed to be studied, and 32 subjects had dementia.The correlation between the MMSE and AMT was 0.87 for the ACAT sample and 0.86 for the MC sample. The correlation between the MMSE and IQCODE was -0.65 for the ACAT sample and -0.56 for the MC sample. The correlation between the DMT and IQCODE was -0.62 for the ACAT sample and -0.54 for the MC sample. The AMT and MMSE had lower sensitivity and specificity in the MC sample compared with the ACAT sample. Using a sensitivity of 78% and a specificity of 88%, chosen on the basis of findings, the positive predictive value in clinical situations varied from 70% for patients over the age of 75 admitted to acute teaching hospitals to 84% for patients seen by ACATs, inpatient geriatric liaison patients or acute geriatric units. The positive predictive value for the general population aged 80-84 years was 45%.The use of these tests is appropriate for the clinical situations described above. Their use in an unselected elderly population is not recommended as the tests are likely to produce more false positives than true cases of dementia.A comparison of alternative methods of screening for dementia in clinical settings.To compare 3 approaches to screening for dementia: cognitive testing, informant report, and neurovisual assessment in a clinical environment.A university hospital in Geneva, Switzerland.Subjects were 76 patients admitted to the Geriatric Hospital or outpatients assessed at the Memory Clinic of the Hospitals of the University of Geneva School of Medicine in Geneva, Switzerland. Thirty-three met criteria for dementia and 11 for depression based on the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Third Edition, Revised.Performance in French-language versions of the Mini-Mental State Examination, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly, and the Clinical Antisaccadic Eye Movement Test.All tests significantly discriminated cases of dementia from noncases. The receiver operator characteristic analysis demonstrated that the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly were more efficient screening measures for dementia than the Antisaccadic Eye Movement Test in this setting. Unlike the Mini-Mental State Examination, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly was unrelated to patients' educational attainment or premorbid intelligence. The previously reported strong relationship between the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Antisaccadic Eye Movement Test was not replicated in these patients.Both cognitive testing and informant report are efficient methods of screening for dementia in clinical settings. Factors such as sensorimotor disability or informant availability may dictate the viability of each approach in individual application. The performance of the Antisaccadic Eye Movement Test precludes recommending its use as a screen for dementia without further research into its performance.Can IQCODE detect poststroke dementia?Little is known about the performance of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) in the screening of post-stroke dementia (PSDE).At 3 months after the index stroke, a research assistant administered the IQCODE to relatives of 189 Chinese patients with acute stroke who were consecutively admitted to a general hospital. A psychiatrist, who was blind to the IQCODE scores, interviewed all 189 patients and made DSM-IV diagnosis of dementia, which served as the benchmark for judging the performance of IQCODE in screening PSDE.The optimal cut-off point of IQCODE was 3.40. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of IQCODE, and the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve, were 88%, 75%, 33%, 98%, and 0.88, respectively.When used as a sole instrument, IQCODE does not appear to be useful in screening PSDE in Chinese elderly.Utility of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) for dementia in a Japanese-American population.Ethnic diversity among older patients in Hawai'i is common; yet few data exist concerning the applicability of cognitive testing instruments in non-Caucasian populations. This project aimed to determine the specificity and sensitivity of the IQCODE for the detection of cognitive impairment in a Japanese-American population. Results confirm that the IQCODE is a valuable tool for primary care physicians to detect impairment in this population.Modified Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) as a screening test for dementia for Thai elderly.A potential test for early detection of dementia in the elderly is the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), which is based on information from the informant for the elderly about the changes of the elderly in everyday cognitive functioning associated with dementia. The present study aimed to modify and assess the reliability and validity of the modified IQCODE consisting of 32 items. The study consisted of two methods of assessing dementia: DSMIV diagnosis carried out by clinicians, and informants responding to the IQCODE. The subjects were 200 pairs of elderly subjects and their informants who visited the Geriatric Clinic, Ramathibodi Hospital. The optimal cutoff score on the modified IQCODE was 3.42, with 90% sensitivity and 95% specificity. The positive predictive values, negative predictive values, and accuracy were 0.94, 0.90, and 0.92, respectively. The IQCODE items had high internal consistency. The IQCODE associated with the elderly person's age, but not with their gender and educational level; nor were they associated with the demographic characteristics of the informant. Therefore, the IQCODE could be used as an alternative screening test for dementia in Thailand with acceptable sensitivity and specificity. This tool may be useful for dementia screening in the community and the geriatric clinic for early detection of disease.[Validation of the S-IQCODE: the Spanish version of the informant questionnaire on cognitive decline in the elderly].Although in the last decade the screening test of dementia have improved, is still being of interest the study of simple methods with a most sensitivity and specificity in the detection of the cognitive decline. Jorm et al have used recently a questionnaire (IQCODE) by which a subject's relative informs of the decline suffered by this in his cognitive capacity. In this work is showed a spanish adaptation of this test, the spanish-IQCODE, analysing it's usefulness for the detection of mild dementia. The S-IQCODE shows a diagnostic validity (sensitivity of 86%, specificity of 92%, positive predictive value of 54% and negative predictive value of 98%) greater than Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE); it also shows a correlation with the diagnostic of dementia greater (r = 0.70 vs r = 0.37); and, different from MMSE, it doesn't show significative correlations with the age, the schooling and the premorbid intelligence. The results in this study show the S-IQCODE as a good test for the detection of the mild dementia, of greater diagnostic power than the MMSE and less contaminated than this by strange variables to the cognitive decline.The combination of cognitive testing and an informant questionnaire in screening for dementia.A cognitive test and an informant report questionnaire were used together to investigate whether their combined use could improve the accuracy of detecting dementia in a memory clinic, compared with either test used alone.The subjects were 323 patients assessed at a memory clinic. The Mini-Mental State Examination and the short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly were used. A method of combining the test scores developed by Mackinnon and Mulligan [Am J Psychiatry 1998; 155: 1529-35] was used. Dementia was diagnosed according to Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Third Edition-Revised criteria.Logistic regression analysis showed that the combination of the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly produced a slightly more accurate prediction of dementia caseness than either test used alone. Using receiver operating characteristic analysis the performance of the combination of the tests according to a weighted sum rule was compared with the performance of either test used alone. This way of combining the tests resulted in a more accurate screening for dementia than when the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly was used alone. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve for the Mini-Mental State Examination combined with the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly was 0.89 compared with 0.82 for the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly alone (chi-square = 10.63; P = 0.0011). However, there was no improvement in screening performance when the combination of Mini-Mental State Examination and Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly was compared with the Mini-Mental State Examination used alone (area under the receiver operating characteristic curve = 0.89 versus 0.86; chi-square = 3.54; P = 0.060).The combination of cognitive testing and an informant report according to a weighted sum rule in this population did not result in any advantage over the use of the Mini-Mental State Examination alone. The mixed results of this study contrast with those of Mackinnon and Mulligan.The screening of mild dementia with a shortened Spanish version of the "Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly".Most of the present screening tests for the detection of dementia fail with mild dementia. Jorm et al. recently presented the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), a simple instrument with good diagnostic validity that uses a close relative to obtain information on the cognitive decline of a patient. We used a Spanish adaptation of this questionnaire (S-IQCODE) validated in a population-based sample, and a shortened form (SS-IQCODE) obtained after analyzing the items and reducing them to only 17. The S-IQCODE and the SS-IQCODE have greater diagnostic validity for mild dementia than the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) (sensitivity: 86% for both versus 57%; specificity: 92 and 91% versus 84%, positive predictive value: 54 and 50% versus 29%; negative predictive value: 91 and 90% versus 81%) and, unlike the MMSE, are independent of the age, education, and previous intelligence of the subjects. According to the results of this study, the SS-IQCODE could be a useful screening test for the detection of mild dementia in the Spanish-speaking aged population, with greater diagnostic power and less contamination by independent variables than the MMSE.[Combined instruments on the evaluation of dementia in the elderly: preliminary results].To determine if a functional scale combined with a cognitive test would improve the diagnostic accuracy of dementia.Thirty patients with mild to moderate dementia, diagnosed according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R criteria, and 46 elderly controls, divided into three groups according to their socioeconomic status and educational level (high, medium and low) were investigated. The subjects were assessed with the MMSE, and their informants were assessed with the scales IQCODE and B-ADL.On the logistic regression, the MMSE isolated classified correctly 86.8% of patients and controls (80% sensitivity and 91.3% specificity). The combination MMSE + IQCODE classified correctly 92.1% of the subjects (83.3% sensitivity and 97.8% specificity), and the combination MMSE + B-ADL classified correctly 92.1% of subjects (86.7% sensitivity and 95.7% specificity).The results suggest that the combination of a cognitive test with a functional scale can improve the detection of mild to moderate cases of dementia even on samples of a very heterogeneous population regarding its socioeconomic status and educational level, as the Brazilian.A comparative study of the performance of screening tests for senile dementia using receiver operating characteristics analysis.The discriminability of three types of test for the detection of senile dementia was assessed within a French sample of 155 normal elderly and 120 persons with mild or moderate senile dementia using Receiver Operating Characteristics (ROC) analysis. Results suggest that despite differences in the content of the three instruments, they are equally discriminant. Methods involving direct cognitive examination were found to lose discriminability in relation to milder forms of dementia, whereas an informant questionnaire was found to perform equally as well on cases of mild and moderate dementia. The informant questionnaire was also found to produce lower refusal rates and to be less influenced by the place of residence of the elderly person. The problem of selecting cut-off points according to the range of predicted prevalence rates of dementia for the general population is also discussed.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE): socio-demographic correlates, reliability, validity and some norms.The IQCODE is a questionnaire which asks an informant about changes in an elderly person's everyday cognitive function. The questionnaire aims to assess cognitive decline independent of pre-morbid ability. In the present study, the IQCODE was administered to a sample of 613 informants from the general population. In addition, the questionnaire was administered to informants of 309 dementing subjects who had filled it out one year previously. A principal components analysis, using the general population sample, confirmed that the IQCODE measures a general factor of cognitive decline. The questionnaire was found to have high internal reliability in the general population sample (alpha = 0.95) and reasonably high test-retest reliability over one year in the dementing sample (r = 0.75). The total IQCODE score, as well as each of the 26-items, was found to discriminate well between the general population and dementing samples. The correlation with education was quite small (r = -0.13), indicating that contamination by premorbid ability is not a problem.Characteristics of a two-stage screen for incident dementia.To avoid costly evaluation of healthy individuals, efficient methods of screening for incident dementia must combine adequate sensitivity and high specificity. Two-stage screening may offer improvements over single-stage methods. We therefore investigated a two-stage screening protocol for incident dementia among 3,308 elderly.We administered the Modified Mini-Mental-State (3MS) or, rarely, Jorm's IQCODE, to a validation sample of 441 high-risk respondents. Informants then completed the Dementia Questionnaire (DQ). Finally, all 441 sample members underwent physical, neurologic, and neuropsychologic assessment. We studied the sensitivity and specificity of the 3MS/IQCODE and DQ using Receiver-Operating Characteristic analyses.A 3MS cut point of 82/83 (of 100) yielded sensitivity and specificity of 91.5 and 90.1%. With 3MS scores of < or =82, a DQ cut point of 2/3 (of five) yielded conditional sensitivity and specificity of 90.2 and 55.3%. Combining these instruments yielded sensitivity and specificity of 82.5 and 95.6%. Age stratification and use of longitudinal decline score criteria did not materially improve these figures.The improved specificity of the two-stage approach offers economies that are attractive, particularly if sensitivity can be enhanced, for example, by examination of a high-risk validation sample.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) as a screening tool for dementia for a predominantly illiterate Chinese population.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) provides ratings of an individual's changes in everyday cognitive functions during the previous 10 years. Original studies conducted in Australia showed that its score was not influenced by the subjects' educational backgrounds and that it performed at least as well as the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) as a screening instrument for dementia. The subjects of the present study were Chinese and included 399 community residents and 61 dementia patients. Their ages ranged from 50 to 92 years; their education levels ranged from 0 to 19 years, and 63% of them had never attended school. We administered the IQCODE to informants and the Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI), from which a CASI-estimated score of the MMSE (MMSE-CE) can be obtained, to the subjects. The diagnosis of dementia was made independently by physicians according to the DSM-III-R criteria based on semistructured interview and testing, neurologic examination, and standardized assessments of cerebral vascular disease, Parkinson's disease, and depression. The Chinese IQCODE showed no association with the subjects' education level or gender, low association with their age, and moderately high association with their MMSE-CE score. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of the IQCODE was significantly larger than that of the MMSE-CE for the whole group and for the subgroup with 1 to 19 years of education but not for the subgroup with 0 years of education. Nine of the 26 items of the IQCODE could be deleted without appreciable reduction in sensitivity and specificity. The IQCODE (1) can be shortened to 17 items, (2) had good cross-cultural applicability, and (3) was better than the MMSE-CE as a screening tool for dementia in a population with large variation in educational backgrounds.[Awareness in patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI)].Patients with Mild Cognitive Impairment (MCI) run a higher risk for the development of a dementia. A disturbed awareness of deficits is a symptom of dementia and could be a predictor for the development of dementia in the assessment in the early stages of dementia. This awareness can be assessed by means of the discrepancy between the assessment of memory problems by patient and partner. In this study, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE-N) was used to assess the level of awareness. The results show that the discrepancy score (the difference between the IQCODE-Nscore of the patient and the IQCODE-Nscore of the partner) was significantly higher for the 61 MCI-patients when compared to the 40 healthy elderly (p = 0,01). This suggests a diminished awareness in MCI-patients. Analysis of the range of the MCI-group shows that this is true for 60% of the patients. Patients with a disturbed awareness score significantly lower on the MMSE (p < 0,01) than patients with an intact awareness.Performance of Brazilian long and short IQCODE on the screening of dementia in elderly people with low education.Dementia screening in elderly people with low education can be difficult to implement. For these subjects, informant reports using the long (L) (26 items) and short (C) (16 items) versions of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) can be useful. The objective of the present study was to investigate the performance of Brazilian versions of the IQCODE L, S and a new short version (SBr) (15 items) in comparison with the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) for dementia screening in elderly people with low education.Thirty-four patients with mild to moderate dementia, diagnosed according to ICD-10 criteria, and 57 controls were evaluated and divided into three groups based on their socioeconomic status and level of education. Patients were evaluated using the MMSE and the informants were interviewed using the IQCODE by interviewers blind to the clinical diagnosis.Education was correlated with MMSE results (r = 0.280, p = 0.031), but not with the versions of the IQCODE. The performance of the instruments, evaluated by the ROC curves, was very similar, with good internal consistency (Cronbach's alpha = 0.97). MMSE correctly classified 85.7% of the subjects while the three IQCODE versions (L, S and SBr) correctly classified 91.2% of the subjects.The long, short and the new short Brazilian IQCODE versions can be useful as a screening tool for mild and moderate patients with dementia in Brazil. The IQCODE is not biased by schooling, and it seems to be an adequate instrument for samples with low levels of education.A short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE): development and cross-validation.Data from four studies were used to assess the psychometric properties of the 26 IQCODE items. The items were assessed in terms of item-total correlations, test-retest reliabilities, correlations with indicators of current cognitive functioning and correlations with indicators of premorbid cognitive functioning. These data were used to develop a 16-item short form. The short form was cross-validated in a new sample using dementia/delirium diagnosis as the validity standard. It was found to perform as well as the long form.Screening of dementia in community-dwelling elderly through informant report.Screening tools for cognitive decline still have low accuracy for dementia, mainly in cases of mild dementia. All of them are affected by factors such as age, sex, educational level, sensory deficits and several mental disorders. The information provided by a proxy close to the patient has been used during recent years in dementia diagnosis. Therefore, new questionnaires, which use standardized information from relatives, have been developed. The aim of this study was to validate a Spanish version (S-IQCODE) of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), a dementia screening questionnaire in Spanish population-based samples. A validity study of the screening tool was carried out in two population-based samples of community-dwelling elderly with different sociodemographic characteristics (urban and rural samples). Dementia diagnosis was performed by neurologists according to DSM-III-R criteria. The S-IQCODE showed a higher accuracy than the MMSE in both samples: sensitivity of 82% and 83% vs 73% and 83%, specificity of 90% and 83% vs 78% and 74%, accuracy of 89% and 83% vs 77% and 75%. Moreover, while the S-IQCODE did not have associations with any extraneous factors, the MMSE showed significant correlations with age (-0.51), educational level (0.62), mental health (-0.40), premorbid intelligence (0.67) and intellectual level (0.75). The results obtained with the S-IQCODE show that it could possibly be applied in screening for dementia in community-dwelling elderly.Sensitivity of the informant questionnaire on cognitive decline: an application of item response theory.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline (IQCODE) is a formal informant report instrument, originally developed by Jorm and Jacomb (1989; Psychological Medicine, 19(4), 1015). The goal of the present study was to evaluate the range of cognitive decline in which the IQCODE is most sensitive, using item response theory (IRT). Existing data (N = 740) from a sample of community-dwelling older adults was used for this purpose. A 2-parameter model estimating item difficulty and discrimination fit the data best. Additionally, the IQCODE provided the most psychometric information in the range of -0.5 < theta < 1.5, with peak information obtained at approximately theta = 0.4. Based on individuals' latent score (theta) estimates, items on the IQCODE are adequate for use as a screening tool for dementia. Results of the item calibration may be useful for targeted assessment needs, such as the development of short forms.Informant ratings of cognitive decline of elderly people: relationship to longitudinal change on cognitive tests.Formal assessment of cognitive decline with cognitive tests can be difficult, requiring either two measurement points or a comparison of 'hold' with 'don't hold' tests. Informant-based assessment provides an alternative approach because informants can adopt a longitudinal perspective and directly rate cognitive change. A study was carried out to assess the validity of informant ratings collected by means of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE). A community sample of 500 subjects aged 74 or over underwent four cognitive tests on two occasions 3 1/2 years apart. On the second occasion, informants filled out the IQCODE. Subjects rated as having moderate or severe decline were found to have greater change on the cognitive tests. These findings support the validity of informant ratings of cognitive decline.Diagnostic utility of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) and its combination with the Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination-Revised (ACE-R) in a memory clinic-based population.The study aimed to assess the clinical utility of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) in patients referred to memory clinics, alone and in combination with the Addenbrooke's Cognitive Examination-Revised (ACE-R) and the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE).This pragmatic prospective study was based on consecutive referrals attending with an informant (n = 144) to two memory clinics over a 12-month period. Patients were diagnosed using standard clinical diagnostic criteria for dementia (DSM-IV) as gold standard (dementia prevalence = 59%). The IQCODE was administered to informants, and the ACE-R and/or MMSE to most patients.The IQCODE proved acceptable to informants, and was quick and easy to use. Using traditional parameters of diagnostic utility (sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, likelihood ratios), the performance of the IQCODE at optimal test accuracy was highly sensitive (0.86) for the diagnosis of dementia but specificity was poor (0.39) with suboptimal positive predictive value (0.67) and small or unimportant likelihood ratios. Overall diagnostic accuracy based on area under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was 0.71. Combining the IQCODE with either ACE-R or MMSE greatly improved accuracy, specificity and positive predictive value when the tests were used in series, but not when used in parallel.In a memory clinic based population, the IQCODE proved sensitive for the diagnosis of dementia but overall diagnostic accuracy was suboptimal. Combining the IQCODE in series with the ACE-R or MMSE greatly improved diagnostic utility.Performance of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) as a screening test for dementia.A 26-item informant questionnaire (IQCODE) and the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) were compared as screening tests for dementia in a sample of 69 patients. Dementia diagnoses were made by both a clinician and a research interview using a computer algorithm to meet DSM-III-R and ICD-10 (Draft) criteria. The IQCODE was found to perform at least as well as the MMSE against all diagnoses and significantly better when judged against the algorithmic ICD-10 diagnoses. Also, the IQCODE was found to be uncontaminated by pre-morbid ability as estimated from the National Adult Reading Test and to have very high test-retest reliability after a delay of a day or more.Can IQCODE differentiate Alzheimer's disease and frontotemporal dementia?Validation of a French version of an informant-based questionnaire as a screening test for Alzheimer's disease.Development of informant-based screening tests for dementia is an emerging field. The reliability and validity of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), an instrument that screens for dementia in general, have been established. We conducted a study to validate a French version of the IQCODE as a screening test for Alzheimer's dementia in the elderly living in the community.In the Canadian Study of Health and Aging, subjects were screened in their own homes using the modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3-MS). Those who screened positive, along with a sample of subjects who screened negative, were referred for a complete clinical examination. In Quebec, an informant was asked to complete the French version, IQCODE(F), at that time. Based on the final clinical diagnoses, performances of the IQCODE(F) and Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE, converted from 3-MS) in screening for Alzheimer's disease were evaluated.Of the 237 subjects, the mean IQCODE (F) score was 3.4 (s.d. = 0.6), on a 5-point scale (1 = improvement in condition over the past 10 years, 5 = marked deterioration, 3 = no change). The mean MMSE score was 23.1 (s.d. = 4.5). The scores on the two scales were correlated (r = -0.44, P < 0.001). The IQCODE(F) scores were unrelated to education (r = -0.07, P > 0.3) in contrast to the MMSE scores (r = 0.28, P < 0.001). With respect to a diagnosis of probable Alzheimer's disease, the IQCODE(F) (cut-off point 3.6) had a sensitivity of 75% and a specificity of 95.6%. The sensitivity and specificity of the MMSE (cut-off point 23) were 70% and 82.3% respectively.The findings of the IQCODE(F) are consistent with those of the English version in correlation with the MMSE and apparent freedom from educational bias. The IQCODE is superior to the MMSE as a screening test for probable Alzheimer's disease in the elderly living in the community. It may be a useful addition to the screening tests already available, especially for the less well educated.Improving detection of dementia in Asian patients with low education: combining the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly.Previous work combining the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) and Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) has been conducted in western populations. We ascertained, in an Asian population, (1) the best method of combining the tests, (2) the effects of educational level, and (3) the effect of different dementia etiologies.Data from 576 patients were analyzed (407 nondemented controls, 87 Alzheimer's disease and 82 vascular dementia patients). Sensitivity, specificity and AUC values were obtained using three methods, the 'And' rule, the 'Or' rule, and the 'weighted sum' method.The 'weighted sum' rule had statistically superior AUC and specificity results, while the 'Or' rule had the best sensitivity results. The IQCODE outperformed the MMSE in all analyses. Patients with no education benefited more from combined tests. There was no difference between Alzheimer's disease and vascular dementia populations in the predictive value of any of the combined methods.We recommend that the IQCODE be used to supplement the MMSE whenever available and that the 'weighted sum' method be used to combine the MMSE and the IQCODE, particularly in populations with low education. As the study population selected may not be representative of the general population, further studies are required before generalization to nonclinical samples.The Informant Questionnaire on cognitive decline in the elderly (IQCODE): a review.The IQCODE is widely used as a screening test for dementia, particularly where the subject is unable to undergo direct cognitive testing or for screening in populations with low levels of education and literacy. This review draws together research on the psychometric properties and validity of the IQCODE.A systematic search of the literature was carried out using three databases.The review shows that the questionnaire has high reliability and measures a single general factor of cognitive decline. It validly reflects past cognitive decline, performs at least as well at screening as conventional cognitive screening tests, predicts incident dementia, and correlates with a wide range of cognitive tests. A particular strength is that the IQCODE is relatively unaffected by education and pre-morbid ability or by proficiency in the culture's dominant language. The disadvantage of the IQCODE is that it is affected by informant characteristics such as depression and anxiety in the informant and the quality of the relationship between the informant and the subject.Because the IQCODE provides information complementary to brief cognitive tests, harnessing them together can improve screening accuracy.Can an informant questionnaire be used to predict the development of dementia in medical inpatients?To determine whether elderly medical inpatients without dementia who score >3.31 on the short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) are at an increased risk of developing dementia.Twenty-nine patients with an IQCODE score of >3.31 without dementia and 29 age- and sex-matched controls, from an original sample of 201 medical inpatients over 65, were examined 17-24 months after initial assessment.Interviews took place in patients' homes, but all subjects had been recruited while medical inpatients in a general hospital 17-24 months previously.The IQCODE and clinical interview to make DSM-III-R diagnosis of dementia.Ten of the study group and one control had developed dementia since the original assessment.Non-demented elderly medical inpatients with an admission IQCODE score of >3.31 are more likely to develop dementia than those with an IQCODE score of <3.31. The IQCODE is a sensitive tool for detecting early dementia.Improving screening accuracy for dementia in a community sample by augmenting cognitive testing with informant report.This study sought to determine whether the augmentation of cognitive testing with an informant report questionnaire could improve accuracy in screening for dementia in a community setting. The sample consisted of 646 subjects aged 70-93 years. Cognitive state was assessed using the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE). Informants completed the 16-item short form of the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE). Dementia was diagnosed according to DSM-III-R criteria. Combination of the IQCODE with the MMSE resulted in more accurate prediction of caseness than either test alone. Receiver Operating Characteristic analysis demonstrated the superior screening performance of a logical "or" rule and a weighted sum of scores on the two tests over other methods of combination, replicating previous clinically based research. The findings also suggest that the appropriate combination of existing tests may be a fruitful method of improving screening accuracy in a variety of situations.Screening for dementia: a review of self- and informant-assessment instruments.The objective of this study was to review available dementia screening instruments that could be recommended for self-administration, particularly in electronic format. Owing to the gradual loss of insight associated with the progression of dementia, a broad definition of self-administration including self-administration by concerned informants (family, friends, carers) was used.A systematic search of PubMed, PsychINFO, and the Cochrane Library Database was conducted. Only available full-text articles about dementia screening instruments written in English were included. Articles reporting on instruments used in a non-English context were excluded unless a validated English version of the instrument was available. Included instruments were assessed against the precise criteria and characteristics of the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE), the most widely used screening instrument.The Concord Informant Dementia Scale (CIDS) and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) were the only instruments meeting all selection criteria. The Memory Impairment Screen (MIS) also met the criteria, although it lacks validation for self-administration. No instrument has been validated for self-administration in electronic format.It is recommended that the MIS, the CIDS and the IQCODE be validated for self-administration in electronic format.Performance characteristics of a two-stage dementia screen in a population sample.We analyzed the performance of a two-stage screening protocol [the Modified Mini-Mental State Exam (3MS) or the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline (IQCODE), and the Dementia Questionnaire (DQ)] in a weighted stratified sample of 839 subjects from a population survey of dementia in Cache County, UT. The subjects were subsequently examined using a standardized diagnostic assessment protocol. Using the method of receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, the main outcome measure was area under the ROC curve (AUC). The overall AUC estimates were 0.956 (95% confidence interval 0.943-0.968) for the 3MS/IQCODE and 0.945 (0.931-0.960) for the DQ. After adjustment for age, the efficiency of the both 3MS/IQCODE and the DQ was better for subjects with genotype epsilon4/epsilon4 at APOE, better among women, and better in those with two or more years duration of dementia. The optimal threshold for this two-stage screen yielded sensitivity and specificity estimates of 91.0% and 92.0%, respectively.Discriminant validity and reliability of the Turkish version of Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE-T).The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) has been used as a measure of cognitive decline in different cultures. The purpose of the study was to establish the validity and reliability of the Turkish version of IQCODE (IQCODE-T) and the ability of the questionnaire to distinguish between older adults with DSM-IV-TR dementia (n = 100) and healthy control participants (n = 60). In addition, the power of the IQCODE-T to distinguish between patients with depression and dementia was investigated. The Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) was performed on all participants and the IQCODE-T was administered to their informants. The IQCODE-T, which was not associated with age or education of the patients, significantly differentiated patients with dementia and controls. The IQCODE-T also correctly classified 73% of depressed patients as "non-demented". Because it is easy to administer, not associated with age/education and yields fewer false-positive results than the MMSE in depression, the IQCODE-T can be used in the detection of dementia.Cognitive impairment in medical inpatients. I: Screening for dementia--is history better than mental state?evaluation of the short version of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) and the Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) as screening tools for dementia in medical inpatients.201 patients over 65 were assessed. Assessment included administration of the AMT, a delirium screening instrument and a brief psychiatric interview. Relatives were interviewed and the IQCODE administered. Diagnostic and Statistical Manual (DSM) IIIR diagnoses of various causes of cognitive impairment were made. Sensitivity and specificity values of the screening tests for a DSM IIIR diagnosis of dementia were calculated.our study suggests that the IQCODE is more accurate than the AMT as a screening instrument for dementia. Using a cut-off point of > 3.44, sensitivity and specificity of the IQCODE for diagnosing dementia were 100 and 86% respectively. Equivalent values for the AMT (cut-off point < 8) were 96 and 73%. It was possible to use the IQCODE in eight of the 10 patients unable to complete the AMT.using both the IQCODE and a brief cognitive function test when screening for dementia in medical inpatients will maximize the number of patients who can be screened.The validity of brief screening cognitive instruments in the diagnosis of cognitive impairment and dementia after first-ever stroke.Brief cognitive tests such as the Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) and the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) have been used to detect cognitive impairment and dementia in studies of stroke patients. However, there are few data on their validity for such use. We have evaluated their validity in detecting cognitive impairment not dementia (CIND) and dementia in a community-based sample of first-ever stroke patients.The standardized MMSE (S-MMSE) and the 16-item IQCODE were administered to 79 patients 1 year after a first-ever stroke. CIND and dementia were diagnosed independently using a comprehensive cognitive battery. The performances of the two tests were evaluated using receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analyses. Combined performance was evaluated when their scores were used in parallel (the "or rule"), in series (the "and rule") or as a weighted sum (the "weighted sum rule").Both tests were extremely poor at detecting CIND individually and in combination. For dementia, at traditional cut-points, the S-MMSE (< or =23) was insensitive (0.50, 95% CI 0.16-0.84) and the IQCODE (> or =3.30) nonspecific (0.63, 95% CI 0.51-0.75). An acceptable balance between sensitivity and specificity was achieved for dementia using the "or rule" combination, but with only modest positive predictive value.The S-MMSE and the IQCODE were individually poor at detecting CIND and dementia after a nonaphasic first-ever stroke. The combination was useful in detecting dementia but it does not replace the need for detailed neuropsychological tests.[Cognitive dysfunction among the elderly evaluated by the cognitive abilities screening instrument (CASI)].The Cognitive Abilities Screening Instrument (CASI) was developed by Japanese and American researchers, including the authors, to examine cognitive functions, based on previous neuropsychological tests, such as Hasegawa's Dementia Scale and the MMSE. From the Adult Health Study (AHS) population of the Radiation Effects Research Foundation, 2052 men and women aged 60 or over and living in Hiroshima were evaluated for their cognitive functions using the CASI. Dementia was diagnosed in 93 and 1,959 were considered not to suffer from dementia based on the DSM-III-R criteria using neurological examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) completed by caregivers. Multivariate regression analysis not only indicated that total score was higher with lower age and higher education but that the slope of its decrease is steeper with higher age and fewer years of education. The slope of score decrease with increase of age was steeper for women than for men. Furthermore, CASI items were categorized by domains of cognitive function. Multivariate regression analysis for each cognitive domain showed clear effects of age and level of education. The effect of age for the nondementia subjects was large in cognitive domains dealing with temporal orientation, short-term memory, and list-generating fluency. The most useful cognitive domains for diagnosing dementia were temporal orientation, short-term memory, and list-generating fluency, as was indicated by high sensitivity and specificity.How useful is the IQCODE for discriminating between Alzheimer's disease, mild cognitive impairment and subjective memory complaints?Informant questionnaires may be useful in diagnosing early dementia. Conflicting results were found when these questionnaires were used to differentiate patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI) from healthy elderly subjects. We evaluated the ability of the most commonly used informant questionnaire, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), to discriminate between Alzheimer's disease (AD), MCI and subjective memory complaints (SMC).Informants of 180 AD patients, 59 MCI patients and 89 SMC subjects who visited the Alzheimer Center of the VU University Medical Center between 2004 and 2007 completed the short Dutch version of the IQCODE. Logistic regression and receiver operating characteristic curves were used to evaluate the diagnostic ability of the IQCODE.The IQCODE was able to differentiate AD from MCI and SMC, but was not able to differentiate SMC from MCI.The IQCODE may be helpful in diagnosing AD but is of limited use in differentiating MCI from SMC.Delirium is an important predictor of incident dementia among elderly hip fracture patients.Delirium is believed to constitute a risk factor for dementia, but previous research has failed to satisfactorily take account of the patients' preexisting level of cognitive functioning.A prospective 6-month follow-up of 106 elderly hip fracture patients free from prefracture dementia. Delirium was assessed by the Confusion Assessment Method. Caregivers described the patients' prefracture cognition by the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly, Short Form (IQCODE-SF). Cognition was measured after 6 months, using 5 validated cognitive tests. An expert panel assessed each case as to whether the diagnostic criteria for dementia according to the DSM-IV were fulfilled at baseline and after 6 months.29/106 patients (27%) developed delirium in the acute phase. In the delirious group, 11/29 (38%) fulfilled the criteria of dementia after 6 months, compared to 5/77 (7%) in the group without delirium (p < 0.001; χ(2) test). Delirium was the strongest predictor of dementia after 6 months (adjusted odds ratio: 10.5; 95% CI: 1.6-70.3). IQCODE-SF score was a nonsignificant risk factor for incident dementia.In hip fracture patients free from prefracture dementia, delirium constitutes the main predictor of dementia 6 months later, adjusted for prefracture cognitive decline measured by the IQCODE-SF.Differentiating between demented and psychiatric patients with the Dutch version of the IQCODE.This study presents psychometric data on the Dutch version of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE-N). We focused on differentiating between inpatients with dementia or a mood/psychotic disorder. A cutoff point of 3.9 on the IQCODE-N correctly predicted group membership in 87.8% and 78.8% respectively. Internal consistency and principal component analysis suggest that the IQCODE-N measures a unidimensional construct. Correlations with a Dementia Screening Test (r = 0.62), nurses' observations on memory disorders (r = 0.71) and a global assessment of severity of dementia (r = 0.72) support the validity of the informant ratings. Patients' age and level of education did not confound informant ratings. Only a small fraction of the informants could not complete the IQCODE-N, which makes it an easily applicable rating scale for cognitive decline.Discriminative and predictive power of an informant report in mild cognitive impairment.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) requires caregivers to rate decline in patients' cognitive and functional performance and has never been used for mild cognitive impairment (MCI).We contrasted the discriminative and predictive power of the IQCODE with that of the Mini Mental State Examination (MMSE) and a verbal episodic memory measure, the Rey's Auditory Verbal Learning Test (RAVLT), in 45 patients with MCI (mean (SD) age at baseline: 71.6 (4.7) years) and 30 outpatients with dementia (70.5 (6.3) years) attending the Neuropsychology Service, St Gerardo Hospital, and compared them with 55 cognitively intact elderly people (70.7 (7.1) years). Patients with MCI were followed up for at least 2 years or until conversion to dementia.In total, 24 patients with MCI (53.3%) had converted to dementia at follow up (mean (SD) duration of follow up 17.0 (7.3) months for converters and 35.0 (7.1) months for non-converters). At baseline, the ability to differentiate patients with MCI from healthy controls was similar for the IQCODE (area under the curve (AUC) 0.86) and the MMSE (AUC 0.84; z = 0.53, not significant). As predictors of conversion to dementia, a trend favouring the IQCODE (AUC 0.86) with respect to immediate (AUC 0.74) and delayed (AUC 0.75) recall on the RAVLT was apparent (z = 1.36, p = 0.087 versus immediate recall, z = 1.51, p = 0.064 versus delayed recall). The independent predictive ability of IQCODE and memory scores was evaluated through logistic regression, and the questionnaire alone yielded the best correct classification of 81%.The IQCODE is an informant based measure of cognitive decline that may provide a relevant contribution to the diagnostic and prognostic investigation of patients with MCI.Racial differences in the recognition of cognitive dysfunction in older persons.We assessed the influence of race and education on informants' reports of cognitive decline in 252 community-residing older persons who were receiving services from senior health agencies. An expert consensus panel made diagnoses of normal cognition, cognitive impairment no dementia (CIND), and dementia based on clinical evaluations and standardized neuropsychological testing (using both population and race-adjusted norms). Informants were interviewed using the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE). Informants of black participants with CIND reported less cognitive decline (lower IQCODE scores) than informants of white CIND participants [3.03 (0.61) vs. 3.23 (0.41); t (117)=2.12, P≤0.036] even though there were no significant differences in the participants' functional and neuropsychological impairments. An analysis of covariance which controlled for informant education indicated that this difference in IQCODE scores was attributable to the fact that black informants had fewer years of education than white informants. There was no statistically significant difference in IQCODE scores for black and white participants with dementia [4.0 (0.7) vs. 4.3 (0.7); t (67)=1.37, P=0.177]. We conclude that racially determined differences in perceptions of early cognitive decline and education may influence informant ratings of older persons. These differences may contribute to disparities in the detection and treatment of cognitive disorders in older black persons.Combining cognitive testing and informant report to increase accuracy in screening for dementia.Cognitive testing and an informant report questionnaire were combined to determine whether their use in combination could improve accuracy in screening for the diagnosis of dementia over either test used alone. Methods of combining test scores that can be readily applied in clinical settings were developed and assessed.The subjects were 106 patients admitted to the geriatric hospital or outpatients assessed at the memory clinic of the university hospital system in Geneva, Switzerland. The instruments used were the Mini-Mental State and the short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly. The diagnosis of dementia was made according to DSM-IV criteria.Logistic regression demonstrated that the combination of the Mini-Mental State and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly resulted in more accurate prediction of caseness than either test alone. The performance of logical "or" and "and" combinations of test results and a weighted sum of scores on the two tests as screens for dementia were investigated by using receiver operating characteristic analysis. By using suitable cutoff points, both the "or" rule and the weighted sum were shown to be capable of improving performance over that of either test used alone.This study shows that informant report can be formally incorporated into assessment for dementia in such a way as to increase the accuracy of detection of cases and noncases. A graphical method was developed that enables the most robust approach to be applied to individual cases without any calculation.Screening properties of the German IQCODE with a two-year time frame in MCI and early Alzheimer's disease.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) is a widely used screening tool for dementia. We aimed to determine the ability of the German version of the 16-item IQCODE with a two-year time frame to discriminate healthy mature control participants (NC) from mild cognitive impairment (MCI) and probable early Alzheimer's disease (AD) patients (all with Mini-mental State Examination (MMSE) scores >or= 24/30) and to optimize diagnostic discriminability by shortening the IQCODE.453 NC (49.7% women, age = 69.5 years +/- 8.2, education = 12.2 +/- 2.9), 172 MCI patients (41.9% women, age = 71.5 years +/- 8.8, education = 12.3 +/- 3.1) and 208 AD patients (59.1% women, age = 76.0 years +/- 6.4, education = 11.4 +/- 2.9) participated. Stepwise binary logistic regression analyses (LR) were used to shorten the test. Receiver operating characteristic curves (ROC) determined sensitivities, specificities, and correct classification rates (CCRs) for (a) NC vs. all patients; (b) NC vs. MCI; and (c) NC vs. AD patients.The mean IQCODE was 3.00 for NC, 3.35 for MCI, and 3.73 for AD. CCRs were 85.5% (NC-patient group), 79.9% (NC-MCI), and 90.7% (NC-AD), respectively. The diagnostic discriminability of the shortened 7-item IQCODE (i.e. items 1, 2, 3, 5, 7, 10, 14) was comparable with the longer version (i.e. 7-item CCRs: NC-patient group: 85.3%; NC-MCI: 80.1%, NC-AD: 90.5%).The German 16-item IQCODE with two-year time frame showed excellent screening properties for MCI and early AD patients. An abbreviated 7-item version demonstrated equally high diagnostic discriminability, thus allowing for more economical screening.Informant ratings of cognitive decline in old age: validation against change on cognitive tests over 7 to 8 years.Informant questionnaires on cognitive decline are increasingly used as screening tests for dementia. Informants can provide a longitudinal perspective that is not possible with cognitive screening tests administered at one point in time. However, there are limited data on the validity of such questionnaires when judged against longitudinal change on cognitive tests.A community sample of elderly people aged > or = 70 was assessed on cognitive tests at baseline and after a follow-up of 7-8 years. The participants were given the Mini-Mental State Examination and tests of episodic memory and mental speed. At follow-up, the short-form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) was completed by informants for 287 of the participants.Elderly people who were rated by informants as having moderate or severe decline had declined significantly on cognitive tests. The IQCODE correlated as highly with cognitive test change scores as these change scores correlated with each other.The IQCODE is a valid way of assessing cognitive decline when assessment can be carried out only at one point in time.The IQCODE: an alternative screening test for dementia for low educated Thai elderly.To explore an alternative method of screening for dementia in Thai elderly people who have a low educational level. The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the elderly (IQCODE) is used as the screening test.A community based population of elderly subjects in Bangkok including 87 normal subjects and 73 demented elderly people were studied. Their ages ranged from 52 to 85 years old. The majority of the elderly people had had four years or less of primary-education. Dementia was diagnosed independently by DSM IV criteria. A short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), a short form, was administered to informants of the elderly by trained medical personnel. The Thai Mini Mental State Examination (TMSE) was also administered to these subjects and compared with the IQCODE. SPSS 9.0 was used for statistical analysis.The IQCODE showed a negative correlation with the TMSE (n=160, r=-0.679, p<0.001). The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC) of the IQCODE was larger than that of TMSE (0.928 vs 0.814). On logistic regression analysis, there were only three questions that contributed to the diagnosis that showed statistical significance. These questions are remembering what day and month it is, learning how to use a new gadget and handling other everyday arithmetic problems. Applying the new formula (z-score), these three questions showed a sensitivity of 84.90 per cent, and a specificity of 92 per cent for the diagnosis of dementia.Informants' perceptions of cognitive impairment of the elderly can be reliably applied as a screening instrument for dementia in the Thai population with a variety of educational levels. A short form of the IQCODE using selected questions can be administered with good diagnostic sensitivity and specificity.Poststroke dementia: incidence and relationship to prestroke cognitive decline.To evaluate the 3-year incidence of poststroke dementia (PSD) and the influence of prestroke cognitive decline.The authors evaluated prestroke cognitive functions in 202 consecutive stroke patients > or =40 years old using the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), with a cut-off of 104 for the diagnosis of dementia. Six months and then annually after stroke, dementia was reassessed. The diagnosis of dementia was based on the International Classification of Diseases, 10th revision criteria in survivors who underwent a visit with a neurologist, or on the IQCODE score obtained by telephone contact with the family in survivors who did not. Statistics were performed using life-table methods.Thirty-three patients were excluded because of prestroke dementia. In the 169 remaining patients, the cumulative proportion of patients with dementia was 28.5% at the end of the follow-up period, with most of PSD occurring during the first 6 months. Using multivariate analysis, independent predictors of PSD were aging, preexisting cognitive decline, severity of deficit at admission, diabetes mellitus, and silent infarcts. Leukoaraiosis was an independent predictor of PSD when prestroke cognitive decline was not taken into account. The presumed etiology of dementia was vascular dementia (VaD) in two-thirds of patients and AD in one-third.The risk of PSD is high, and increased in patients with prestroke cognitive decline, with about one-third of patients meeting the criteria for AD and two-thirds meeting the criteria for VaD. These results confirm that, in stroke patients, an underlying degenerative pathology may play a role in the development of PSD.Combining functional scales and cognitive tests in screening for mild cognitive impairment at a university-based memory clinic in Brazil.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of the Mini-Mental State Examination combined to the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly for the identification of mild cognitive impairment.191 elderly subjects were assessed with the Mini-Mental State Examination, and their informants were assessed with the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly. Subjects were divided into three groups according to their cognitive state (controls: n = 67, mild cognitive impairment: n = 65 and dementia: n = 59), which was ascertained by clinical and neuropsychological evaluation. The diagnostic accuracy of each test in the discrimination of diagnostic groups (mild cognitive impairment vs. controls, mild cognitive impairment vs. dementia and dementia vs. controls) was examined with the aid of ROC curves. We additionally verified if the combination of both tests would increase diagnostic accuracy for mild cognitive impairment and control identification.The combination of the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly scores did not increase the Mini-Mental State Examination diagnostic accuracy in the identification of patients with mild cognitive impairment.The present data do not warrant the combination of the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly as a sufficient diagnostic tool in the diagnostic screening for mild cognitive impairment.Screening cognitive decline in dementia: preliminary data on the Italian version of the IQCODE.The IQCODE is a retrospective questionnaire for caregivers about changes which occurred in a patient's cognitive and functional efficiency in the previous 10 years of life. Previous studies demonstrated the validity of the IQCODE for the screening of dementia similar to that of traditional cognitive screening tests, with the additional advantage of allowing the detection of cognitive change, rather than just cognitive impairment. The present paper deals with the preliminary results of the validation of the Italian version of the questionnaire in a sample of 45 mild to severely demented patients and 13 patients with mild cognitive impairment (MCI), compared to 20 cognitively intact elderly subjects. The IQCODE demonstrated satisfactory discriminative power for dementia as well as for MCI and a good correlation with the MMSE.Everyday functioning in relation to cognitive functioning and neuroimaging in community-dwelling Hispanic and non-Hispanic older adults.The purpose of this study was to examine how a specific informant-based measure of everyday functioning, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE; Jorm & Korten, 1988) relates to cognition and structural neuroimaging in a large multicultural, multilingual sample of Caucasians and Hispanics. Cognitive variables included selected subtests from the Spanish and English Neuropsychological Assessment Scales (SENAS; Mungas et al., 2000): Verbal Memory, Object Naming, Verbal Attention Span, Verbal Conceptual Thinking, and Pattern Recognition. The association between the IQCODE and selected neuroimaging variables, hippocampal volume and white matter hyperintensity, was evaluated in a subsample of English- and Spanish-speaking Hispanic individuals. The cognitive variables showed strong bivariate relationships with the IQCODE, although only Verbal Memory and Object Naming independently predicted level of functional ability. Verbal Memory was the strongest predictor of functional status, accounting for 23% of the variance in the IQCODE. White matter hyperintensity was also independently related to the IQCODE, accounting for 18% of the variance. Hippocampal volume was related to the IQCODE in a simple bivariate analysis, but was not an independent predictor of reported functional status after controlling for age. The relationships between cognitive variables and functional status, as well as between the imaging variables and the IQCODE, did not differ across language-ethnic groups.[Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE): cross-cultural adaptation for use in Brazil].This article presents the results of the translation and cross-cultural adaptation of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) and the test-retest reliability of a version to be used in Brazil. An instrument review committee analyzed the conceptual and item equivalence. In order to analyze semantic equivalences, three translations and three back-translations were performed; a summary version was devised and pre-tested, and a test version elaborated. The Cronbach's +/- coefficient and intraclass correlation coefficient (ICC) were used to measure the internal consistency and test-retest reliability, respectively. Of the 169 informants assessed, 97 were retested. A Cronbach's +/- of 0.94 and an ICC of 0.92 were found. The reliability levels lead to the conclusion that the IQCODE-BR version is easy to comprehend. Satisfactory equivalence to the original version was observed.The predictive value of dementia screening instruments in clinical populations.To determine the positive predictive value of the Mini-Mental Status Examination (MMSE), the Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) and the Informant Questionnaire for Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) for dementia in different clinical settings.Sensitivity and specificity of tests were compared against the criterion standard of clinical diagnosis made by a geriatrician or psychogeriatrician.Two groups of patients were studied, a referred group of outpatients to a memory clinic (MC) and a random selection of patients referred to an aged care assessment team (ACAT).Of 437 eligible MC patients, 299 were used in analyses of whom 216 subjects had dementia. Of 100 randomly selected ACAT patients, 78 agreed to be studied, and 32 subjects had dementia.The correlation between the MMSE and AMT was 0.87 for the ACAT sample and 0.86 for the MC sample. The correlation between the MMSE and IQCODE was -0.65 for the ACAT sample and -0.56 for the MC sample. The correlation between the DMT and IQCODE was -0.62 for the ACAT sample and -0.54 for the MC sample. The AMT and MMSE had lower sensitivity and specificity in the MC sample compared with the ACAT sample. Using a sensitivity of 78% and a specificity of 88%, chosen on the basis of findings, the positive predictive value in clinical situations varied from 70% for patients over the age of 75 admitted to acute teaching hospitals to 84% for patients seen by ACATs, inpatient geriatric liaison patients or acute geriatric units. The positive predictive value for the general population aged 80-84 years was 45%.The use of these tests is appropriate for the clinical situations described above. Their use in an unselected elderly population is not recommended as the tests are likely to produce more false positives than true cases of dementia.A comparison of alternative methods of screening for dementia in clinical settings.To compare 3 approaches to screening for dementia: cognitive testing, informant report, and neurovisual assessment in a clinical environment.A university hospital in Geneva, Switzerland.Subjects were 76 patients admitted to the Geriatric Hospital or outpatients assessed at the Memory Clinic of the Hospitals of the University of Geneva School of Medicine in Geneva, Switzerland. Thirty-three met criteria for dementia and 11 for depression based on the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Third Edition, Revised.Performance in French-language versions of the Mini-Mental State Examination, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly, and the Clinical Antisaccadic Eye Movement Test.All tests significantly discriminated cases of dementia from noncases. The receiver operator characteristic analysis demonstrated that the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly were more efficient screening measures for dementia than the Antisaccadic Eye Movement Test in this setting. Unlike the Mini-Mental State Examination, the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly was unrelated to patients' educational attainment or premorbid intelligence. The previously reported strong relationship between the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Antisaccadic Eye Movement Test was not replicated in these patients.Both cognitive testing and informant report are efficient methods of screening for dementia in clinical settings. Factors such as sensorimotor disability or informant availability may dictate the viability of each approach in individual application. The performance of the Antisaccadic Eye Movement Test precludes recommending its use as a screen for dementia without further research into its performance.Can IQCODE detect poststroke dementia?Little is known about the performance of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) in the screening of post-stroke dementia (PSDE).At 3 months after the index stroke, a research assistant administered the IQCODE to relatives of 189 Chinese patients with acute stroke who were consecutively admitted to a general hospital. A psychiatrist, who was blind to the IQCODE scores, interviewed all 189 patients and made DSM-IV diagnosis of dementia, which served as the benchmark for judging the performance of IQCODE in screening PSDE.The optimal cut-off point of IQCODE was 3.40. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of IQCODE, and the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve, were 88%, 75%, 33%, 98%, and 0.88, respectively.When used as a sole instrument, IQCODE does not appear to be useful in screening PSDE in Chinese elderly.Utility of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) for dementia in a Japanese-American population.Ethnic diversity among older patients in Hawai'i is common; yet few data exist concerning the applicability of cognitive testing instruments in non-Caucasian populations. This project aimed to determine the specificity and sensitivity of the IQCODE for the detection of cognitive impairment in a Japanese-American population. Results confirm that the IQCODE is a valuable tool for primary care physicians to detect impairment in this population.Modified Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE) as a screening test for dementia for Thai elderly.A potential test for early detection of dementia in the elderly is the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), which is based on information from the informant for the elderly about the changes of the elderly in everyday cognitive functioning associated with dementia. The present study aimed to modify and assess the reliability and validity of the modified IQCODE consisting of 32 items. The study consisted of two methods of assessing dementia: DSMIV diagnosis carried out by clinicians, and informants responding to the IQCODE. The subjects were 200 pairs of elderly subjects and their informants who visited the Geriatric Clinic, Ramathibodi Hospital. The optimal cutoff score on the modified IQCODE was 3.42, with 90% sensitivity and 95% specificity. The positive predictive values, negative predictive values, and accuracy were 0.94, 0.90, and 0.92, respectively. The IQCODE items had high internal consistency. The IQCODE associated with the elderly person's age, but not with their gender and educational level; nor were they associated with the demographic characteristics of the informant. Therefore, the IQCODE could be used as an alternative screening test for dementia in Thailand with acceptable sensitivity and specificity. This tool may be useful for dementia screening in the community and the geriatric clinic for early detection of disease.[Validation of the S-IQCODE: the Spanish version of the informant questionnaire on cognitive decline in the elderly].Although in the last decade the screening test of dementia have improved, is still being of interest the study of simple methods with a most sensitivity and specificity in the detection of the cognitive decline. Jorm et al have used recently a questionnaire (IQCODE) by which a subject's relative informs of the decline suffered by this in his cognitive capacity. In this work is showed a spanish adaptation of this test, the spanish-IQCODE, analysing it's usefulness for the detection of mild dementia. The S-IQCODE shows a diagnostic validity (sensitivity of 86%, specificity of 92%, positive predictive value of 54% and negative predictive value of 98%) greater than Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE); it also shows a correlation with the diagnostic of dementia greater (r = 0.70 vs r = 0.37); and, different from MMSE, it doesn't show significative correlations with the age, the schooling and the premorbid intelligence. The results in this study show the S-IQCODE as a good test for the detection of the mild dementia, of greater diagnostic power than the MMSE and less contaminated than this by strange variables to the cognitive decline.The combination of cognitive testing and an informant questionnaire in screening for dementia.A cognitive test and an informant report questionnaire were used together to investigate whether their combined use could improve the accuracy of detecting dementia in a memory clinic, compared with either test used alone.The subjects were 323 patients assessed at a memory clinic. The Mini-Mental State Examination and the short form of the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly were used. A method of combining the test scores developed by Mackinnon and Mulligan [Am J Psychiatry 1998; 155: 1529-35] was used. Dementia was diagnosed according to Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Third Edition-Revised criteria.Logistic regression analysis showed that the combination of the Mini-Mental State Examination and the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly produced a slightly more accurate prediction of dementia caseness than either test used alone. Using receiver operating characteristic analysis the performance of the combination of the tests according to a weighted sum rule was compared with the performance of either test used alone. This way of combining the tests resulted in a more accurate screening for dementia than when the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly was used alone. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve for the Mini-Mental State Examination combined with the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly was 0.89 compared with 0.82 for the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly alone (chi-square = 10.63; P = 0.0011). However, there was no improvement in screening performance when the combination of Mini-Mental State Examination and Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly was compared with the Mini-Mental State Examination used alone (area under the receiver operating characteristic curve = 0.89 versus 0.86; chi-square = 3.54; P = 0.060).The combination of cognitive testing and an informant report according to a weighted sum rule in this population did not result in any advantage over the use of the Mini-Mental State Examination alone. The mixed results of this study contrast with those of Mackinnon and Mulligan.The screening of mild dementia with a shortened Spanish version of the "Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly".Most of the present screening tests for the detection of dementia fail with mild dementia. Jorm et al. recently presented the Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE), a simple instrument with good diagnostic validity that uses a close relative to obtain information on the cognitive decline of a patient. We used a Spanish adaptation of this questionnaire (S-IQCODE) validated in a population-based sample, and a shortened form (SS-IQCODE) obtained after analyzing the items and reducing them to only 17. The S-IQCODE and the SS-IQCODE have greater diagnostic validity for mild dementia than the Mini-Mental State Examination (MMSE) (sensitivity: 86% for both versus 57%; specificity: 92 and 91% versus 84%, positive predictive value: 54 and 50% versus 29%; negative predictive value: 91 and 90% versus 81%) and, unlike the MMSE, are independent of the age, education, and previous intelligence of the subjects. According to the results of this study, the SS-IQCODE could be a useful screening test for the detection of mild dementia in the Spanish-speaking aged population, with greater diagnostic power and less contamination by independent variables than the MMSE.[Combined instruments on the evaluation of dementia in the elderly: preliminary results].To determine if a functional scale combined with a cognitive test would improve the diagnostic accuracy of dementia.Thirty patients with mild to moderate dementia, diagnosed according to ICD-10 and DSM-III-R criteria, and 46 elderly controls, divided into three groups according to their socioeconomic status and educational level (high, medium and low) were investigated. The subjects were assessed with the MMSE, and their informants were assessed with the scales IQCODE and B-ADL.On the logistic regression, the MMSE isolated classified correctly 86.8% of patients and controls (80% sensitivity and 91.3% specificity). The combination MMSE + IQCODE classified correctly 92.1% of the subjects (83.3% sensitivity and 97.8% specificity), and the combination MMSE + B-ADL classified correctly 92.1% of subjects (86.7% sensitivity and 95.7% specificity).The results suggest that the combination of a cognitive test with a functional scale can improve the detection of mild to moderate cases of dementia even on samples of a very heterogeneous population regarding its socioeconomic status and educational level, as the Brazilian.A comparative study of the performance of screening tests for senile dementia using receiver operating characteristics analysis.The discriminability of three types of test for the detection of senile dementia was assessed within a French sample of 155 normal elderly and 120 persons with mild or moderate senile dementia using Receiver Operating Characteristics (ROC) analysis. Results suggest that despite differences in the content of the three instruments, they are equally discriminant. Methods involving direct cognitive examination were found to lose discriminability in relation to milder forms of dementia, whereas an informant questionnaire was found to perform equally as well on cases of mild and moderate dementia. The informant questionnaire was also found to produce lower refusal rates and to be less influenced by the place of residence of the elderly person. The problem of selecting cut-off points according to the range of predicted prevalence rates of dementia for the general population is also discussed.The Informant Questionnaire on Cognitive Decline in the Elderly (IQCODE): socio-demographic correlates, reliability, validity and some norms.The IQCODE is a questionnaire which asks an informant about changes in an elderly person's everyday cognitive function. The questionnaire aims to assess cognitive decline independent of pre-morbid ability. In the present study, the IQCODE was administered to a sample of 613 informants from the general population. In addition, the questionnaire was administered to informants of 309 dementing subjects who had filled it out one year previously. A principal components analysis, using the general population sample, confirmed that the IQCODE measures a general factor of cognitive decline. The questionnaire was found to have high internal reliability in the general population sample (alpha = 0.95) and reasonably high test-retest reliability over one year in the dementing sample (r = 0.75). The total IQCODE score, as well as each of the 26-items, was found to discriminate well between the general population and dementing samples. The correlation with education was quite small (r = -0.13), indicating that contamination by premorbid ability is not a problem.